I get caught up in you. You're caught up in me. We're so tangled together that I just keep hurting you. You keep hurting me. We're stuck in this pattern.
Something went wrong and we tried so hard to fix it. Couldn't hold on, so we blamed it on the distance and now I'm in hell.
I hope you're happy, when I miss you madly. Don't hold it against me, but I'm not even close to letting you go yet.
I let the waves crash down. Keep it all inside. Don't try to work me out, I've done it all my life.
Just let the weight on my shoulders keep on weighing me down a little bit longer. I'm alright. Don't worry about me.
If I'm honest I need you to help me out. I need a hand sometimes
Don't let the weight on my shoulders keep on weighing me down for one minute longer. I'm so tired, so can you help me?
Mama said 'Gonna be alright.', but Mama don't know what it's like in my mind.
Mama said that 'The sun will shine.', but Mama don't know what it's like to wanna die.
I'll do anything for love. I don't feel like I'm enough. You can probably see right through me. Cause I can promise if you knew me, you would probably walk away. No, you wouldn't wanna stay.
Tell my maker, up above, that I have had enough.
Oh, please. Come bring me up from my lowest, take me higher. Can you see me through the ashes and the smoke?
What can I do when I'm not friends with my reflection and I don't understand affection like you do?
You say that you'll help me, say that I'm worth it, but I don't deserve it.
It's easy for you, you know you're perfect and I need your hand, but I don't wanna burn it.
What do I think? Why do I care? Will I leave? Am I just scared? Give me a drink, give me some air.
By the time I know just what I have, it'll be when I lose it all.
Even if we burn this down and we can't be friends, can we just be happy?
I have no right to miss you, when I didn’t wanna stay. I have no right to need you, and I knew what my heart was gonna lose.
Night falls, I'm wide awake wishing I could call you. I'm too used to hearing all about your day.
Even when it's cold, you know I'll be there. No matter where we go, you know I'm right here.
Your smile is all I wanna see tonight. Being with you, it just brings me light. All I wanna do is hold you tight, if that's alright.
Even when it's rough, you know I'll be here. When times are getting tough, you know I'm right here. When life is not enough, you know I'll be there next to you.
I gave up everything to be right there. You didn't say a single word to show that you cared.
Watch my heart break to pieces, is this what you needed?
I know you don't love like I loved you and you never did all along. Tell me I'm wrong.
I gave it all just to watch you live your life. You didn't care for mine.
Who said it? You said that it's you and I forever. Who said it? You said that we'd take on the world together.
Do you want me? Do you want me like you always did? Do you want my body like when we first kissed? It's just you look at me strange, like you don't know my name.
If you won't try, then I won't try. When you say you love, I know you lie.
I wish I could read your mind, but I'm scared of what I'd find. When you tell me we're alright, is that the truth?
Did we both fall in love before we were ready? Or did we both give up before we were steady?
I guess sometimes you find the one, but the timings off. The place is wrong. Maybe we would be closer if we were a couple years older.
I guess sometimes you fall in love, but then one day it feels like you wake up and everything's over. Without any closure.
Did we both think that this was the best that we found? Or were we too afraid to have no one around?
These are questions in my head, answers I won't get. Thoughts I never said, that I kinda wish I did.
You don't have to be a hero to save the world.
It doesn't make you a narcissist to love yourself.
It feels like nothing is easy, it'll never be.
That's alright. Let it out. Talk to me.
You don't have to be a prodigy to be a geek.
You don't have to know what to say, or what to think.
You don't have to be anybody you can never be.
Anxiety. Tossing, turning in your sleep. Even if you run away, you'll still see them in your dreams.
We can talk here on the floor. On the phone if you prefer. I'll be here until your okay.
I'm afraid of all I am. My mind feels like a foreign land. Sirens ringing inside my head.
I've spent all of the love I've saved, we were always a losing game.
Loving you is a losing game.
I tell myself you don't mean a thing and what we got, got no hold on me, but when you're not there I just crumble.
Only love can hurt like this, must've been a deadly kiss.
I wouldn't care if you walked away, but every time you're there I'm begging you to stay.
Stand alone, my soul is jealous. It wants love, but I reject it. Trade my joy for my protection.
Why haven't you found me, yet?
I wish you just loved me back.
Watch them laugh at all my secrets. Scream and yell, but I feel speechless. Ask for help, you call it weakness. Lied and promised me my freedom.
When my friends start asking if I miss you, what do I say?
Don't wanna hear your name tonight. Wanna be happy, not in a mood. I don't wanna think about you.
If I hear your name one more time, I think I'm gonna lose my mind. Don't know what to do cause I'm not alright, but if I don't laugh I'm gonna cry.
Have you ever been anything other than true? Have you? Never been good, but I've never been better.
I don't want to let that body go.
Be my queen, I'll be your king. We'll be rulers, I'll give you everything.
I know I won't make it on my own.
Unbelievers, get down on your knees.
In the moment, when I feel your touch everything will turn to gold.
We say we're friends, we know we're not.
I just wanna keep you to myself. It's a rush, it's a problem.
Scared to sit close to you cause I don't trust what I might do.
You stare a bit too long, my heart, it beats unsteady.
Don't wanna let you go, but you gotta know that I need you. I need you badly.
We almost kissed last night and we still might.
I don't want your love, I just want tonight, so let's stop wasting time. I don't need your name.
On the tip of my tongue, it feels so wrong, but deep in your heart, it feels so right.
Where you hiding? I just want you to come in.
My dear, just grab my hand and let me take you to my wonderland.
I guess the night's tonight. Are you gon love me hard?
Show me how you like it done.
Look me in the eyes and confess your lust.
Hold my hand, I'll make you feel like never before.
Say my name.
Now you're calling me up on the phone, so you can have a little whine and a moan. It's only because you're feeling alone.
You say that you want me back and I tell you it don't mean jack.
You play me like an instrument, but I'm addicted to it. Yea, I'm addicted to it.
How'd we let it get this far?
Now I'm doing what I wanna do. Thinking more about me, a little less of you.
If we ever lost this, I couldn't stand it. Don't you ever let me take you for granted.
You only want me, I only want you for the rest of my life.
I still think about you when I'm lonely and I hope you think about me too.
Why'd you break me? Why'd you leave me?
I'm sick of trying to get over you, like you want me to, but I'm not.
Oh no, here I go again. Letting you back under my skin. Took so long getting over you, now I'm right back where I started.
Even after all that, kinda miss what we had. I just wanna fall back, fall back into you.
We can try to keep it a secret, but I don't want to. Why would I wanna hide that I got a girl like you.
Baby, you and me. We could be the talk of this town. We could be that rumour going around. We can make my ex go crazy when she sees your car at my house.
I'd be better off just staying home, alone, with me, myself and wine.
I better get too drunk to drive, or else I'll probably turn around and change my mind.
I got so much to tell you about the day I had, but you'll never know because you never asked.
I can't keep setting myself on fire just to keep you warm. No, I can't be the lightning and the storm.
When you wanna talk, I'm always there. We always play it your way and it's never fair.
When I need your loving, it's no where to be found and when you push me out, I always come back around.
Are you the person that makes me feel certain? If that's it, then here's the truth. Fly away, fly away. I wanna be a part of your fantasy.
Take my hand, I'll be your neverland.
You're more than just some of my treasures.
You never turned your back on me baby, even when I get a little bit crazy. 
You love every last thing about me. The cover of the book and all the pages in between. My beautiful and the not so pretty. My insecure when I'm drinking whiskey. I love that you love who I am, who I was, every last thing about me.
Is this the start of the end? Cause you don't reach for my hand over coffee or turn the lights off and tell me you want me and I feel more like a friend. Either way I would do it again.
You don't call me, so let's call it what it is and the distance doesn't get to you like I wish it did.
I could throw a fit, go kicking and screaming or I can love you and let you leave with your reasons.
The time we lost, it's no ones fault.
I think I've had enough of it. Come on, be a gentleman. Old school love, yea that old school love. Stereo over your head. Roses lying on the bed. Old school love, want that old school love.
All I want is your love to be classic. Bring your heart close to mine, so I can have it.
I don't need you to call me. Faking your love with a sorry.
Don't want the run around. A little more tequila helps it all go down. The way you turned a good thing to a battleground. They say what goes comes back around.
Your hallelujah, Sunday morning. All I've ever needed, wanted. Underneath this pale moon sky, I'm gonna make you mine.
Gonna take you slow dancing by the water, I just wanna hold you tight.
I want that all in, falling. Keep the fire burning like the first time feeling no matter what if I'm gonna love somebody like that.
Kinda heart, open arms. Says forever and will never ever take it back. If I'm gonna love somebody like that.
Love don't know what distance is.
I know it's crazy, but I don't want good and I don't want good enough. I want can't sleep, can't breathe without you love.
It doesn't make sense to anybody else. Who cares if you're all I think about? I've searched the world and I know now. It ain't right if you ain't lost your mind.
I don't want easy, I want crazy. You with me baby? Let's be crazy.
We're the kinda crazy people wish they could be.
Love too big for a love song. If I tried to sum it up, I know I'd get it wrong.
Four chords, three minutes, you'd never fit in it. So I just take you line by line. I'll be writing about you for the rest of my life.
There are things that I sing that I'll never have the confidence to say. Like I'm still not convinced that I won't be too much for you one day.
When it comes to you, I'm still tryna find the words.
Promised you I'd never leave.
What's there to talk about?
Said that you just needed me. But I gotta go and now I guess you just feel like you're not enough and it's all my fault. Please don't give it up.
I've been singing songs about you. My harmony is gone without you falling in my arms.
Why is love always so hard?
I've been writing words I mean, but I lose my rhythm when you leave.
Don't ever let me go. You're the music I need most.
The truth is that I already found you.
Even when the show is done, you'll still be my everything.
I know I'm not good at telling you the way I'm feeling.
You saw me for me, made me believe in myself.
On the day that I met you, it all turned around.
Fall into me and I'll catch you darling. We'll dance in the street like nobody's watching. It's just you and me.
I'm drunk on your voice, high on the moment. I'd fall for you twice if that's what you wanted.
I'd give you my life from now til forever. I'm falling in love with you over and over again.
Until I had met you, there was no sun in my sky, no mirrors for monsters and no love in sight.
You walked down those stairs and I knew my heart wasn't mine.
On the day that I met you, my whole world came alive.
Why don't you come on over?
Stop making a fool out of me.
Someone like you and all you know and how you speak.
I hope it's gonna make you notice.
Look at the stars. Look how they shine for you and everything you do.
You know I love you so.
I swam across. I jumped across for you. Oh, what a thing to do.
I drew a line. I drew a line for you. Oh, what a thing to do.
When you touch me I can feel how much you love me and it just blows me away.
I've never been this close to anyone or anything. I can hear your thoughts, I can see your dreams.
I don't know how you do what you do. I'm so in love with you, it just keeps getting better.
I wanna spend the rest of my life with you by my side.
Every little thing that you do. Baby, I'm amazed by you.
Baby, you surround me. You touch every place in my heart.
It feels like the first time every time. I wanna spend the whole night in your eyes.
Been wondering who will be there to take my place? When I'm gone, you'll need love to light the shadows on your face.
Could you make it on your own?
If I could, then I would. I'll go wherever you will go. Way up high or down low.
Maybe, I'll found out a way to make it back someday. To watch you, to guide you through the darkest of your days.
I hope there's someone out there who can bring me back to you.
Run away with my heart. Run away with my hope. Run away with my love.
I know now, just quite how my life and love might still go on. In your heart, in your mind. I'll stay with you for all of time.
If I could turn back time, I'll go wherever you will go. If I could make you mine, I'll go wherever you will go.
It started out with a kiss. How did it end up like this?
Choking on your alibi, but it's just the price I pay.
I don't see what you can see in someone who only causes you heartache and pain.
Hey, put on a happy face, then everything's okay.
If you're sad, don't let it show.
We're tick-tock, tick-tock, ticking like a timebomb.
Say you're good, say you're fine. Tell em everything's fine.
Lost another perfect day. I know I'll never feel the same.
Where did everything go wrong? Can we put my life on pause?
Screaming, but the pain goes on and on.
I love it when you hate it. Why am I so complicated?
I'm just stuck here feeling dead.
It was a lose, lose from the start. Stitch by stitch, I'm ripped apart.
Another day, another breakdown.
Why can't shit ever just work out?
I lost the person I used to be. I'm a walking catastrophe.
Got me begging on my knees. Somebody just fucking kill me.
Master of self-sabotage.
Don't wanna live as an untold story, rather go out in a blaze of glory.
I can't hear you, I don't fear you. I'll live now cause the bad die last.
Dodging bullets with your broken past.
Wrapped in your regret. What a waste of blood and sweat.
I wanna taste love and pain, wanna feel pride and shame.
I don't wanna take my time, don't wanna waste one line.
I wanna live better days, never look back and say could have been me.
Don't wanna live as an unsung melody, I'd rather listen to the silence telling me I can't hear you, I won't fear you.
Don't wanna wanna wake up on a Monday morning. The thought of work is getting my skin crawling.
Somebody's gonna hurt your feelings. Some lovers gonna break your heart, tear it into a million pieces.
Sometimes, some things fall apart. Not every day is gonna be easy. You might collect some scars.
We will fall, we will break. Yea, we all will make mistakes. Don't be scared, it's okay cause tomorrows another day. Let the rain wash away all the problems of yesterday.
Go easy on yourself, keep trying. Keep doing the best you can cause lord knows you're bound to fly.
Bright future in your hands, nothing's gonna stop you now. Keep your head out of the clouds.
Tell your friends that I'll be lost without you.
I hate the fast that you made me love you.
How'd you make me love you?
Fuck you for making me feel like a goddamn fool.
Goodbye to the guy I knew.
You're mistaken if you think you can manipulate me one more time.
My love is your fear.
Been a hell of a ride, but I'm thinking it's time to grow.
I'm way too young to lie here forever. I'm way too old to try, so whatever.
What am I fighting for? Whose side am I on?
Say it enough and you start believing.
Every shoulder you've leaned on is the one you will turn on.
Nobody left to forgive or forget.
What am I dying for? What have we all become?
If you cross her path you just might end up dead.
Behind those angel eyes, lies a devil in surprise.
If you break her heart, you might just meet your end.
I don't belong among the angels, and baby that's just fine with me.
I promise honey, I can feel your pain.
I promise honey, I can feel your pain and maybe I enjoy it just a little bit, does that make me insane?
You'll be thinking your past it, but it gets worse.
Baby, now I'm back on my bullshit.
Now I got you wishing you were with me, but I thought you swore this was the end.
If you're sad and you know it and you don't want to show it clap your hands.
They say that if I try that I could maybe be someone, but I'm scared because I know deep down that day may never come.
If you're sad, that's okay. You can clap it all away, just clap your hands.
Shut up and be happy, it's all in your head. Grow up and be happy cause it ain't that bad.
Talking like we used to do. It was always me and you.
Do you like walking in the rain? When you think of love, do you think of pain?
You're the reason that I feel so strong. The reason that I'm hanging on.
You know you gave me all that time. Did I give you enough of mine?
Did I catch your attention? You look like you lost your breath.
I could make it nice and easy. I'ma take the lead.
Someone told me love was only in the movies. It don't exist in real life these days.
This has gotta be the night that dreams come true. Everything feels just right cause when I'm with you.
Everything that I've ever wanted, right in front of me.
I'm empty and broken. What is the point?
I'll hide away and push everyone from me and in my mind, I face resistance. Wanna be alone, but I hate the distance.
When I die, I know they won't miss me. Give it a week, and then they will forget me.
Don't wanna be alone, but I know it's for the best. My head's like my room cause that shit is a mess.
I haven't felt like myself in months, got too attached, and now I feel stupid. I need to have a talk with Cupid, snap-in half all the arrows he shooting. I feel so god damn foolish.
If I never said goodbye to you, if I never broke your heart in two, I wouldn't hate myself the way that I do.
If I never let you slip away, if I never made so many mistakes, I wouldn't have to fall asleep through the day just so I can see your face.
Would you even talk to me? I'm sure that we'll meet in this small town. Would you look away? Pretending to stare at your phone, keep on looking down.
A million things to say, but there's no words to change the past and sorry won't work, even if it's the first time I've ever said it.
I know that I did you wrong, I know you're already gone, but I'm not the same kind of person you met. I wouldn't ever have hurt you again.
The jury said she's charming, but her exes say she's wicked.
She ain't out to get you, but she's better on your side.
She don't wanna be anybody else. She's a woman in total control of herself.
It's such a wonder to be under her spell.
Baby, don't run, you're breaking my heart.
I try to forget you. Mission impossible.
I know that we can do it right, do it right. It's time for us to come alive, come alive and do everything we didn't do. You can say my love is true, but I don't know how not to love you.
I deleted your number, your address on my phone. I don't look at your pictures or anything you post. Yet somehow you still in my head. Every hour, every day.
We both need a second chance baby to finally leave this agony cause on my own I'm going crazy and you're my sanity.
Now, I'm calling your number. Please pick up the phone, so I can give you an answer and let you know just how I love you.
Staying up real late, I miss you next to me.
I'm the only one who truly knows you best, baby. Don't forget the things we did to put our minds at ease.
I don't wanna be apart, I'll be careful with your heart cause I wear mine on my sleeve.
I don't wanna be apart, so let's go back to the start. You know that's where I'm gonna be.
We were always together, I know I made you feel better. We loved without caution.
Used to love flying solo, but now I'm not sure cause now, when I'm doing my thing I know who I'm doing it for.
If I'm fighting, I'm fighting for you and if I'm calling, I'm calling for you.
Tell me that we're giving it a try or we'll never know. We don't have to move fast, we can take it slow.
Even if it ain't all it seems, I got a pocketful of dreams.
Your timing was so wrong and I just want to be found.
Nothing's gonna hurt me with my eyes shut.
I am drawing pictures, I'm evading.
You come over with your friends. I don't wanna talk to them and all I really want is to start again.
Some days I can't even dress myself. It's killing me to see you this way.
There's an old voice in my head that's holding me back. Well, tell her that I miss our little talks.
Don't listen to a word I say. The screams all sound the same.
You're gone away, I watched you disappear. All that's left is a ghost of you. Now we're torn apart, there's nothing we can do. Just let me go, we'll meet again soon. Now wait for me, please hang around. I'll see you when I fall asleep.
Feeling stupid cause I know it ain't no you and me.
These battle scars, don't look like they're fading. Don't look like they're ever going away. They ain't never gonna change.
I wish I never looked, I wish I never touched. I wish that I could stop loving you so much cause I'm the only one that's trying to keep us together when all of the signs say that I should forget her.
I wish I couldn't feel, I wish I couldn't love. I wish that I could stop cause it hurts so much and I'm the only one that's trying to keep us together when all of the signs say that I should forget her.
I wish you weren't the best, the best I ever had. I wish that the good outweighed the bad cause it'll never be over until you tell me it's over.
When the night feels like forever I'll remember what you said to me. I know you've been hurting waiting on a train that just won't come. The rain, it ain't permanent and soon, we'll be dancing in the sun and we'll sing your song together.
Your story's gonna change, just wait for better days. You've seen too much of pain now, you don't even know that your story's gonna change.
We both admit we had it good, but until then it's alienation.
If you ask me how I'm doing, I would say I'm doing just fine. I would lie and say that you're not on my mind, but I go out and I sit down at a table set for two and finally I'm forced to face the truth. No matter what I say I'm not over you.
You do it well and I thought you were innocent. Took this heart and put it through hell, but still you're magnificent.
If I had the chance to renew, you know there isn't a thing I wouldn't do. I could get back on the right track, but only if you'd be convinced.
You just broke my heart, even though you promised you'd never do that from the start, but I guess we can only make it so far.
Let me know when it's time to come back, maybe when your life is on track and you don't have to hesitate.
Luckily for you, I'm patient. I'm ok with your making me wait and as long as you're near, I'll be here.
The memories won't go away. I feel pain every time I hear your name, but I always think of you the same.
Time wasn't in our favour. This isn't goodbye, this is simply see you later.
Your smile in the back of my mind making me feel like I just wanna know you better.
All I know is we said hello and your eyes look like coming home. All I know is a simple name. Everything has changed. All I know is you held the door. You'll be mine and I'll be yours.
All I feel in my stomach is butterflies, the beautiful kind making up for lost time, taking flight, making me feel like I just wanna know you better.
Come back and tell me why I'm feeling like I've missed you all this time.
Meet me there tonight and let me know that it's not all in my mind.
I'm not ready to be just another of your mistakes.
I fell victim to the sound of your love.
You're like a song that I ain't ready to stop.
I've got nothing, but you on my mind.
This love is difficult, but it's real. Don't be afraid, we'll make it out of this mess.
Darling, nobody said that it would last forever. That doesn't mean we didn't try to get there.
I never said that we would die together. That doesn't mean it was a lie.
I wished you all the love you're looking for.
Two burning hearts are dared to break.
I'll always love you, will you always love me?
I hate that all these memories are so persistent and now I know how hard it is to move on with my life when all of these daydreams come back to me at night.
I hate that it will take time to forget this and now I know it's better to love you from a distance.
I hate that I still miss you. I wish I could forget you.
When you got nobody to turn to, just hold on and I'll find you.
I'm smiling in everyone's face, I'm crying whenever they leave the room. They don't know the battle I face, they don't understand what I'm going through.
Let's pack our stuff now and run away.
Let's make our days what we want and I'll give you my last name.
All we wanted was a place to feel like home. That's why we parted from our ways to heal our souls.
Baby, don't call me your friend.
Tried to keep you close to me, but life got in between.
Once upon a different life, we rode our bikes into the sky, but now we're caught against the tide.
I tell you I want you, but you don't listen to me.
If we never try, we'll never know what we could be.
I know we said we'd give each other space. Just need to know you're alright.
Although feelings faded, we're not strangers.
Just because we're not friends, doesn't mean I don't care. Are you alright?
Don't know how to just stop. Used to love you too much. Are you alright?
I've been losing sleep wondering if you're good, so please just pick your phone up. Let me know and I'll stop.
Ain't got everything you want, but got everything you need, so take a chance on me.
I've been sitting here tryna figure out, what did I do right to be with you right now?
After all this time, I'm still into you. I should be over all the butterflies, but I'm into you.
Some things just make sense and one of those is you and I.
You gotta admit we were so dumb. Oh baby, how did we manage to mess this up?
I'm wide awake, missing your face, missing your taste, wishing you were lost with me.
Been telling myself that it's a waste of time, but maybe I'm dumb not to call cause baby living without you ain't right.
It's you who takes care of everyone else. You need to allow me to help, you are appreciated.
It's you who somehow is always the first to take care of me at my worst. You are appreciated.
I will pull you up cause without a doubt the tables turn around, you pick me off the ground.
I can hold my breath. I can bite my tongue. I can stay awake for days if that's what you want. Be your number one.
I can fake a smile. I can force a laugh. I can dance and play the part if that's what you ask. Give you all I am.
I'm only human and I bleed when I fall down.
I'm only human and I crash and I break down.
Your words in my head, knives in my heart. You build me up and then I fall apart.
I can turn it on. Be a good machine. I can hold the weight of worlds if that's what you need. Be your everything.
It's like I'm burning from inside out and I think I know who to blame.
You're like a slo-mo explosion that you can see from space. You melt the sky to the ocean and everything that's in your way.
You left me wondering if you ever cares.
I wish you stayed, but I'll be ok cause I learned from you that life's not always fair.
I don't even miss you anymore cause I've been doing fine without you in my life.
They say that cigarettes can kill, they say to stay away from pills, that too much liquor makes you ill, but no one warned me about you.
I've always followed warning signs, but there were none in front of you.
You're gonna send me to the ER with the things you do to my heart. They could give me all the stitches, but part of me is missing. It's you.
My heart breaks when you keep your distance. I get headaches, it's just one of the symptoms. I'm a rare case and nobody knows what to do cause no one can fix me, but you.
So when our eyes have seen their better days and our hearing starts to fade, put your arms round my neck and your heart on my chest, 'I love you' will still sound the same.
Bills pile up and time tests our love. We'll stay forever in love. We'll stick to our guns, our grip won't loosen up. We say forever ain't enough.
You planned this in the end and now it's over. Say what you wanna say, you lied and I got played. You threw it all away and now it's over.
We'll be together never, so baby, you can bite me.
Just face it, we didn't make it. You bit off more than you can chew, can you taste it?
Should've held on, should've treated me right.
You're the one habit I just can't kick.
She'll tear a hole in you, the one you can't repair, but I still love her. I don't really care.
It's better to feel pain, than nothing at all.
I beg to dream and differ from the hollow lies.
I walk a lonely road, the only one that I have ever known. Don't know where it goes, but it's home to me and I walk alone.
My shadow's the only one that walks beside me.
My shallow heart's the only thing that's beating.
Sometimes I wish someone out there will find me. Til then, I walk alone.
I wish my heart was always on her mind cause she's on mine like all day, all the time.
If you like me, then say you like me.
You need a pick me up? I'll be there in twenty five.
Have you no idea that you're in deep? I've dreamt about you nearly every night this week.
There's this tune I found that makes me think of you somehow and I play it on repeat until I fall asleep.
Maybe I'm too busy being yours to fall for somebody new.
Crawling back to you.
It feels so good out on the road and on my own. Waking up no strings attached, no looking back.
I know the road is my home. That's what it feels like to be free.
Always hoping that things would change, but we went right back to your games.
I've never known anybody like you.
I like you, but that's not enough.
Tell me everyday I get to wake up to that smile.
Get your heart away from me, you'll put me into a trance.
I don't want this to hurt, just don't say love. I've heard that word misused a thousand times before.
I'm not gonna run away. I'm not the type to leave you.
I'm afraid to be lonely.
So much to say, but I don't speak.
Where were you when everything was falling apart?
In the end everyone ends up alone, but losing her. The only one who's ever known who I am, who I'm not and who I wanna be.
You could give me chills on a summer day. When we're laying still, but you make my heart race.
I know that time moves on, but some things don't change.
I won't stop getting butterflies. I get them everytime I look into your eyes.
You won't stop running through my mind for the rest of both our lives.
I still fall in love with you everytime I see your eyes, it takes me back to the first time I saw you smile.
I've seen that dress on you before, but every time I do, I swear it only makes me love you more.
You know I'd fall apart without you. I don't know how you do what you do.
You're more than everything I need. You're all I ever wanted.
If I said I'm falling, would you just reply 'I know you are, but what am I?'
Was this all a joke to you?
I don't wanna say I miss you if I don't know that you miss me back.
I wish I told you that I loved you.
Some things we don't talk about, rather do without and just hold the smile.
Am I crazy to think that I could be in love? When it all ends up wasted.
I'd give you my heart, but I'd just fuck it up.
I know how to leave, but not to stay.
Swear the only one I want is you and it doesn't matter what we do.
We could have nothing at all and it'd still feel like nothing's missing.
I'm forever yours.
I thought relationships were nothing but a waste of time.  I was happy saying I had a love that wouldn't last. That was the only way I knew til I met you.
Tell me, is it only me? Do you feel the same? You know me well enough to know that I'm not playing games.
Put it down on me, take it out on me.
Text me, booty call, call me.
I'll be your favourite scene.
She'd take the world off my shoulders if it was ever hard to move.
She'd turn the rain to a rainbow when I was living in blue.
Why then if she's so perfect, do I still wish that it was you? Perfect don't mean that it's working, so what can I do?
I try to fall for her touch, but I'm thinking of the way it was.
I'm only here passing time in her arms.
Say I'm not your type, but I know what's on your mind.
Don't be shy, you decide. Say, can I make you mine?
I'm confident when I'm with you.
Even when we fade eventually, I'm nothing. You will always be my favourite form of loving.
Lately I've been feeling not alive, but you bring me back to life.
Can you be my lover up until the very end?
I'll be there, whenever you want me.
It's only you, nobody new, I put you first.
I can fill those places in your heart no one else can
Every time it feels brand new, wish I could rewind the things we do.
Everything's frozen, nothing but you and I.
Make me a promise, tell me you'll stay with me.
Let's just fall in love for the hell of it. Maybe, we'll just keep falling.
When I'm around you, I feel it in my veins. There's something about you that's making me go insane.
All of these years, all of this time, still you got all my attention.
Darling, I love that I know you like no one does.
I see all of your sides and the new ones I'm trying to learn.
I need to know, how do you feel?
Do you know how in love with you I am?
Everything that you do, it makes my heart stop.
Lay down a list of what is wrong. The things you've told them all along, pray to god they hear you.
I wrote you a letter and I threw it away. No matter how small I write it, there's always so much more to say.
I'll love you more as the years pass us by. If you ever doubt it, just look in my eyes and you'll know for sure.
Nobody said it was easy, no one ever said it would be this hard.
I wouldn't want to spend a minute loving anybody else.
I love being around you. You make it easy.
I hope he treats you better than I ever could cause you deserve the world times two.
You know that I want to be with you all the time.
I miss you so we'll take it slow.
We'll draw the curtains and never leave home.
Why do I get so nervous when I look into your eyes? Butterflies can't stop me falling for you.
If you wanna be with me, baby, there's a price to pay.
I can make your wish come true.
Waiting for someone who needs me.
You don't have to look like a movie star. I think you're good just the way you are.
Tell me if you could, would you up and run away with me?
If I showed up with a plane ticket and a shiny diamond ring with your name on it, would you wanna run away too? Cause all I really want is you.
Don't you be alone, you can always find me.
Talking to a stranger is nothing new. She knows how to smile, but not like you.
Holding onto us for worse or better.
Life is great without a car.
I ain't trying to do what everybody else doing, just cause everybody doing what they all do.
Am I wrong for thinking that we could be something for real?
Only those I really love will ever really know me.
These are questions in my head, answers I won't get. Thoughts I never said that I kinda wish I did.
I guess sometimes you fall in love, then one day feels like you wake up and everything's over.
Did we both think that this was the best that we found or were we too afraid to have no one around?
I don't think you realize how long I had to fight to be living my life, to get better and never have to try not to think of you until you reached out.
You're a real life fantasy, but you're moving so carefully, let's start living dangerously.
Let's lose our minds and go fucking crazy.
If you love me, don't let go.
I need you now, but I don't know you yet.
I only got half a heart to give to you and I hope it's enough.
A full commitment's what I'm thinking of, you wouldn't get this from any other guy.
I'll find the time, we will find the timing cause you are on my mind. I hope that you don't mind it.
Some say you will love me one day and I will wait, I will wait to get your loving one day.
I wanna call you up, but maybe it will only make it worse.
I want that can't sleep love. The kind that I dream about all day, the kind that keeps me up all night.
I'm tired of dreaming of no one, I need somebody next to mine.
Tell yourself I love you and I don't want you to go.
Write this down, take my words and read them everyday. Keep them close by, don't you let them fade away, so you'll remember what I forgot to say.
I don't care what they say other lovers do, I just wanna dance with you.
I wanna dance with you, hold you in my arms once more. That's what they invented dancing for.
I'm not yours and baby you're not mine. We've got something and it sure is fine.
There's one thing that we both agree, I like you and baby you like me.
Fuck depression, I'm just under pressure.
She a sidekick, I don't need no side bitch.
Your love is scaring me, no one has ever cares for me as much as you do.
You look better every day, I swear. Really, it's a little unfair. Baby, I'm star struck by you. Didn't know we'd get so far and it's only the start.
If we fall apart, maybe it wasn't meant to be.
Would you love her the way that she loved you?
Oh my god, I'm a fool. Keep on coming back to you.
There's a spot on your chest, just for me, it's personally addressed and anyone there before me should be a criminal offense.
I wanna live in a world where all your exes are dead. I wanna kill all the memories that you save in your head.
I wanna live in a world where there's no exes at all, like you were waiting for me to be the first thing you fall for.
When your friends tell stories about 2023, I hope they hardly can recall there was a you without a me.
You tell me not to worry, I'm the only thing you see. Well, yea, I fucking better be.
Let me know if there's something I'm missing cause this is all I need.
Through the highs and the lows, we'll be always.
Will we end up just like Ross and Rachel?
Being with somebody helps, but if I'm honest with myself I'll break my heart again.
I don't wanna die or fade away, I just wanna be someone. Dive and disappear without a trace.
I'll make the moon shine just for your view, I'll make the starlight circle the room and if you feel like night is falling, I wanna be the one you're calling.
I know this is my final chance. All I'm tryna do is find my path to you.
In my dream you stay, calling your name. Stayed up til late, just thinking of you.
Now everything I've been thinking of you. I tried a million times to cut you loose.
Is it obvious you're all I had?
Never meant to start a fight. Guess I'm just living in your past, but I never thought you'd forget me so fast.
I guess the good things ain't meant to last. I gave you forever, you gave a month.
I know what you say about me, I hope that it makes you happy. You can't seem to get me off your mind.
I'll kiss your ass goodbye.
I want your love, I don't wanna be friends.
You should've made some plans with me, you knew that I was free and you won't stop calling me, I'm kinda busy.
You don't get to choose what I do with the hurt you gave me.
I'm finally quitting the games, take your attention away. Feeling myself again. Not gonna listen today, so you can get out of my way. I'm getting over it, yea.
Hope you know it's all an act cause it's so much easier to lie.
I'll be your shoulder to cry on, wipe the tears from your eyes.
I was fine before I met you. I was broken, but fine. I was lost and uncertain, but my heart was still mine.
You're on me like jewelry. I really like it.
Why'd you have to go and make me like you? This is a feeling I'm not used to.
You say we're just friends, but friends don't know the way you taste.
I didn't tell you all my secrets just to pull my heart out.
I didn't take you to my family just to show you their house.
I didn't work this hard to get this far, then leave it so soon.
I didn't love to lose somebody like you.
I'm done with listening to you talk about yourself like you're something special, when you're not.
You got no hope tryna get me back cause I'm so close to getting over that, so you can stop with all your games, I just don't feel the same.
I'm never going back to hell
I've got regrets like the first time that we met. Started fucking with my head the second you lay on my bed.
Love me, love me, say that you love me. Fool me, fool me, go on and fool me.
Love me, love me, pretend that you love me. Leave me, leave me, just say that you need me.
I really want to come kick it with you.
Holla at the next chick soon as you're blinking.
Would you be my love?
You get me so up, then push me down like I'm your own personal elevator.
You pull me all in, then you pull me out. Acting all nice just to hide your bad behaviour.
I love to hate you, but I hate that I love you.
You had me packing all my bags and now I'm sad I'm somewhere else.
You say you're so, so, so, sorry, now, but I don't believe a word from your mouth.
This is what you do to me. Pull you off, put you back, glued to me.
I wanna make you mine
Everywhere I go I wanna see your face.
Everybody knows something I don't and I wonder how to keep a good thing going.
All my friends are falling in love, all my friends are locking it up, but I can't seem to settle down cause I'm waiting on you to come around.
Everybody looking like a honeymoon, but all that I've been looking for is me and you.
I said treat me better, but you didn't believe me.
Walk away, finally let me breathe. Stop being so obsessed with me.
We fall like astronauts cause when I'm with you I can fall fast. Look what you're making me do.
I never knew it could feel like getting high on just feelings.
You make me wanna try harder. Never wanted to, but I want with you.
I should have listened to my friends. They told me it was gonna end right when it started.
I hope to see you happy one day.
I'm obsessed with you, but you never work me out.
I get a little jealous, a little selfish. You know that it's all good, I'm just a little messed up, like you.
Love how you built this, I'm gonna tear it down.
I wonder if I ever cross your mind, for me it happens all the time.
Said I wouldn't call, but I lost all control and I need you now.
Guess I rather hurt than feel nothing at all
How are you all around me, when you're not really there?
Why do you say you want me then tell me you're not coming in?
Everytime I'm with you I go into a zone.
Remind me why we're taking a break. It's obviously insane cause we both know what we want, so why don't we fall in love?
Tryna tell you that I'm sorry, yea I really wanna work this out.
If only you could see all the pain that it put me through, then maybe you would believe me.
This love is difficult, but it's real.
I was selfish, couldn't help it, but I still care about you.
I know I'm stubborn, but I still think about you.
Maybe it was me who fucked it up.
Lies on lies on lies and every single time you call I fall for this.
You can't make this right, it's time to say goodbye and leave this where it is.
The last of my patience has just disappeared. Why are you still on the line? You've taken so much time from me, my dear.
It's time for you to try the loneliness I feel.
Do me a favour and hang up the phone cause all the love that we made was such a fucking mistake and now I'm ready to go.
Maybe one day you'll learn to go and respect the worth of a person like me.
We'll go down in history as lovers from the start, just me and you.
Lost in a place where I know you can see my soul. Make me lose track of time.
You're still my favourite melody.
Goodbye, get out of my life.
You run while I lose control. I miss you forever, you'll stay gold.
I never said it was the best thing for you.
Say goodnight, our first goodbye. I've only got forever and forever is fine, just take your time.
You stole my eyes and I've never looked back.
Just fall into place and you'll fall into me.
Put your heart where your mouth is.
Baby, make a move. My neon eyes are set on you.
Tell me, what can I say to make your body come this way?
You say the storm will pass, we'll work it out. The road can get a little rough sometimes.
Baby, we belong alone. This last second chance is blown.
Baby, we belong alone. I've got another you at home.
Your mouth, it moves, but fails to speak.
When you leave me for no reason, I'll give you a reason.
I'm a mess and you're worse, just give me time to give you a waste of time.
Maybe I'm crazy, but don't try to save me cause I've never felt so alive
If the universe is you and I, then I know everything is gonna be alright. So tell me, what do you have to lose?
Why don't you lock me up with joy and kisses? Lock me up with love? Chain me to your heart's desire, I don't want you to stop.
Lock me in and hold this moment, never get enough. Ain't no way I'm ever breaking free.
You don't analyze me cause you can see what I'm trying to be.
I've been lost and I've been blinded by all the things that I've seen.
Who are you? You're looking like a stranger, you were once my love and my saviour. Now I'm left with nothing, but your makeup on my pillow.
If I said I wished you the best, I was lying.
I'd rather live with broken bones than lay here all on my own like a lovesick fool.
Where'd you go? You said you'd never leave me.
I gave you everything you ever wanted. You gave me nothing but grief. Now that I'm gone you'll see I'm your missing piece. Well, good luck, finding another me.
I can't remember why I ever let you walk all over me.
I won't take your shit forever. Now, it's time for me to leave.
Now, don't you know that karma tastes so sweet.
She's the truth inside the world of lies keeping all my hope alive.
There's nothing I can do, I just gravitate towards you.
I'll say anything I can to give me more than just a dance. Tell me where to put my hands. You know that you could be my favourite one night stand.
I'm not like the other boys cause with you I've got no choice.
I think you're from another world and I couldn't love another girl cause you make me feel like I'm intoxicated.
Can you tell that I need you with me? Let me drink you down tonight.
No, I don't just want any pretty face, wanna wake up next to yours each day.
I can shake you, but then I'll break you.
I wish I could give you my love and my soul, but inside my chest, there is nobody home.
My heart may be missing, but my hands will make up for it. Don't think this is innocent, I'll sink my teeth right into it.
It feels just like it was yesterday we were in love, why's it falling apart?
I've never been one to walk away, but I've had enough and it's breaking my heart.
Baby, I know that you're good, but I don't want a good girl, no, not today cause I want it bad.
I want a bad girl, baby, bad. I want a love that's crazy, yea.
There's no guarantee that this will be easy. It's not a miracle you need, believe me. Yea, I'm no angel, I'm just me, but I will love you endlessly.
Tell me what's the point of doing this every night what you're giving me is nothing but a heartless lullaby.
Baby, make up your mind cause I can't keep sleeping in your bed if you keep messing with my head.
You're just playing. I keep waiting for your heart.
I'm your one and only, only when you're lonely.
No matter where we're going, I'll be by your side.
Even if you slip away, I'll be there to fall into the dark to chase your heart.
No distance could ever tear us apart.
There's nothing that I wouldn't do. I'll find my way back to you.
It's been way too long for me to find it this hard.
I wonder if your friends have had to carry you home and stay for the night because they don't want to leave you alone.
I know it's cruel, but I kind of hope you're tortured too.
Are you there by yourself, dialing, redialing my number?
Tell me, does your heart stop at the party when my name drops?
If she gives you her heart, don't you break it.
Let your arms be a place she feels safe in.
She's the best thing that you'll ever have.
She'll love you if you love her on days when it feels like the whole world might cave in. Stand side by side and you'll make it.
She'll love you if you love her like that.
When she doesn't notice how pretty she is, tell her over and over, so she never forgets.
You're my kryptonite.
I'm dying just to make you see that I need you here with me now.
Get out of head and fall into my arms instead.
Now, I'm climbing the walls, but you don't notice at all that I'm going out of my mind.
Find another one cause she belongs to me.
If only you saw what I can see. You'll understand why I want you so desperately.
Don't go tonight. Stay here one more time, remind me what it's like and let's fall in love one more time. I need you now, by my side.
I'm begging please, just stick around.
I'm sorry, don't leave me, I want you here with me.
With every drama, a piece of me dies.
They kissed me and promised I will be alright. We both know it's bullshit.
My baby plays me like a game, I'm not having fun.
I'm tired of holding on.
Why do we insist on crossing bridges that do not exist?
Day by day by day we're falling down, but life goes on.
Stand upm life is too damn short.
We can get a little crazy just for fun.
Push up to my body, sink your teeth into my flesh.
All I am is a man, I want the world in my hands.
If I may just take your breath away.
I don't mind if there's not much to say, sometimes the silence guides our minds.
Tell me how you're sleeping easy, how you're the only one thinking of yourself?
Show me how you justify telling all your lies like second nature.
You sink your teeth into the people you depend on. Infecting everyone, you're quite the problem.
Who am I kidding? Now, let's not get overzealous here, you've always been a huge piece of shit. If I could kill you, I would.
Listen, mark my words, one day you will pay. Karma's gonna come collect your debt.
The best thing I've seen if you.
I'll go wherever the wind blows, just as long as you are by my side.
I'll be wherever this road leads, just as long as you are here tonight.
Anywhere with you is home.
I did it all with you.
I can drive a thousand miles if I'm driving there with you.
I can drive the rest of my life if it'll always be us two.
Why should you care what they think of you?
Don't you like you? Cause I like you.
I should've played it cool, instead I made a fool. Oh, the things I do cause I'm young and I'm dumb. I do stupid things when it comes to love.
I should've played it cool, instead I made a fool. Oh, the things I say cause I'm young and I'm dumb. I do stupid things when it comes to love.
I should've shut my mouth, I could've kept it quiet.
I think sometimes I tend to be my own worst enemy.
I can't handle these pressures.
Sometimes I just wanna drown out all of the thoughts in my mind, too much going on at the same time.
Life just sucks, then we all die.
I don't wanna live, but I'm too scared to die.
Wish I could erase my memories, so I could stop feeling so empty.
I'm fucked up, but I don't wanna be.
I feel broken, shattered and blue and it's all because of you.
If this is love, why does it break me down? Why do you break me down?
It's been a while since I smiled.
Kiss me now and remind me why I ever wanted to make you mine.
You're the other half of my broken heart.
It was easy to find another for your bed.
How does it feel to leave me this way, when all that you have's been lost in a day?
I'll never let you go, don't you leave me lonely.
I know I shouldn't have let you go.
Ever since the moment that I met you, you've been on my mind and I need to somehow let you know that I think about you all the time
When you think about love, think about me. I can give you more than you'll ever need.
You play pretend and now you're all on my mind. Why are you wasting my time?
You don't really like me, you just don't like to be alone. You don't have to lie and say that you want more when you don't.
I won't let you put those words in my mouth.
You're playing a game and I don't want the pressure.
Why do we have to pretend? Let's just call it like it is.
Why do we have to be friends? Let's just call it like it is.
I know it isn't easy, but I think we need a brand new start.
I don't need anything as long as you're beside me.
Take my hand and don't you let it go now.
Nothing's more exciting when you're right next to me.
You got no love, then you're with the wrong man.
Known each other since forever, you always seem to have my heart.
Everytime you find somebody, you tell me how you think they're the one. It's hard for me to take. You love me in a way that I don't want.
You look at me like I'm someone you only need when it goes wrong, but you look at him like he's your missing piece and darling, I wish it was me.
Always hope to be the reason you can't sleep at night, the one you miss so much you're barely breathing. The face you see when you turn out the light.
Everytime you've got nobody, I'm thinking maybe I could be the one.
I just want to take you home, but you whispered to him that you're ready to leave and darling, I wish it was me.
I may be bad, but I'm perfectly good at it.
Loving you is cherry pie.
I don't wanna hit reverse, you've already got me in so deep. It's only gonna make it worse. We break up, make up, on repeat.
Am I losing my mind? Tell me are you with it cause you keep tryna rewind.
You keep saying we're fine, but the look in your eyes. Oh, it just can't lie.
We're going backwards.
I get the feeling that we're living in the past.
When we find a present, is it ever gonna last?
We would talk all the way through the night, pick you up and we drive. No, I never thought we'd be stopping.
Nothing's wrong, but when you're not in my arms. I send voice notes, you send hearts. You get quiet and I know that means you miss me.
You're jealous, you shouldn't be. I want you obsessively, but I know how complicated it can get.
When you're not in front of me, I know insecurities get in your head.
I'm not gonna interrupt if you need to talk about it.
You know you're mine, you just forget sometimes.
Hey stupid, I love you.
Nothing's wrong, I just get in my head too. Can you reassure me you, you're still in it?
I just wish you could lean in and kiss me. Say nothing's wrong, tell me to settle down. You do it better than I've ever known how.
Won't pull some tricks for attention, but could I get a little now?
I got time while she got freedom.
Her best days will be some of my worst.
While I'm wide awake, she's no trouble sleeping.
What am I supposed to do when the best part of me was always you?
What am I supposed to say when I'm all choked up and you're ok?
I'm falling to pieces.
She's moved on while I'm still grieving.
One's still in love while the other one's leaving.
You got his heart and my heart and none of the pain. You took your suitcase, I took the blame.
You left me with no love, with no love to my name.
I didn't mean to hurt you, so why'd I let you walk out the door?
You say that you don't know me, you don't know who I am anymore, but if you knew the truth, then you wouldn't feel insecure.
If I didn't have you, I wouldn't have nothing at all.
I wish you could see yourself through my eyes. I always forget that you can't read my mind.
As long as I got you and me, moving through this world as a two man team. I'll always have everything I need.
You don't even realise what you mean. No one could fall for you quite like me, no one could get me so perfectly.
You don't even realise you're all that I need cause I want you and me.
All of the broken hearts and the stupid mistakes have got us to where we are, it was worth all the pain.
With you close, I'm the happiest I ever was.
I see myself next to you until we're old.
You know how they say you got the real thing when nothing else matters, I love you like that.
All I wanna say is I got the real thing and nothing else matters, I love you like that.
Right when I hold you, don't you know the truth? One look in my eyes and you should know the truth.
I was wrong to say I loved her, I was wrong to think I'm right. When I told her it was over, oh my darling, I had lied.
I've been running from my demons, afraid to look behind. I've been running from myself, afraid of what I'd find.
How am I supposed to love you when I don't love who I am? How can I give you all of me when I'm only half a man? Cause I'm a sinking ship that's burning, so let go of my hand.
What's broken can't be whole anymore.
No one can ever hurt me like I hurt myself cause I'm made out of stone and I'm beyond help, don't give your heart to me.
I wasn't looking for nobody when you looked my way.
Who knew that you'd be up in here looking like you do? You're making staying over here impossible.
You don't love me no more.
Trust that I won't do shit. I've used up all my attempts.
Don't give a fuck and I know you're gonna be a no show, hanging out with them hoes.
You got my mind messed up. Look in my eyes and fess up. Do you want this relationship with me? Abandon the ship or should I sink?
Not your brother, your dude or your homie. Don't call me that shit then the night night be talking bout 'do you wanna come and hold me?'
Baby girl, you don't know me. Hate that you call when you're lonely.
All you do is disappoint me, but I'm in love and you're fucked up.
Sorry that I am not enough, but tell me how you feel, the silence is real.
You say you love me, I know you ain't mean it.
Your feelings, they change like the seasons.
I'm not afraid to hurt your feelings.
I start to say goodbye, say goodbye to all that we had, say goodbye to what we lost.
We don't talk, we're not enough.
We were running in the dark, we were following our hearts and we would fall down, and we would slowly fall apart. We would slowly fall into the dark.
It is hard to let it all go. Let the past just disappear.
Try to untie from an old life, but it always drags me down.
I'm like inception, I play with your brain.
I don't play no games.
A little gambling is fun when you're with me.
Baby, when it's love, if it's not rough, it isn't fun.
I won't tell you that I love you, kiss or hug you.
I'm sure that you're not just another girl. I'm sure that you're gonna say that I was sexist. I feel like you're running out of all the things I liked you for.
Why can't we be friends when we are lovers? Cause it always ends with us hating each other. Instead of calling me out, you should be pulling me in.
If you ever find yourself stuck in the middle of the sea, I'll sail the world to find you.
If you ever find yourself lost in the dark and you can't see, I'll be the light to guide you.
If you're tossing and you're turning and you just can't fall asleep, I'll sing a song beside you.
If you ever forget how much you really mean to me, everyday I will remind you.
You'll always have my shoulder when you cry. I'll never let go, never say goodbye.
I can see you're letting go. I can see we;ve lost control. We used to be so strong, baby, where did we go wrong?
Why won't you save me? I don't wanna let you go. Baby, I know things get crazy, it's been like how long but, I don't think nobody can save me.
I can't even look at you baby. Well how can you blame me?
Yea, I hurt you, but you just turn around and hurt me all over again.
Baby, this is going on too long. How many times must you knock me down? I can't take it any longer. I'm getting weak, you're getting stronger.
You heard my cries, said goodbyes, you come home back. Why you play me like that? Hurt me like that? Desert me like that?
Don't go away. I know that I've been acting out of place, but I guess it's nothing new for you these days.
I'm sorry if this doesn't feel right. I'm sorry if I ruin every night. I'm sorry that I'm sorry all the time.
Maybe it's just who I am, or who I'm not right now, but I only feel this way when you're around.
I really shouldn't have to talk like this. Those words shouldn't leave my lips, say goodbye with an empty kiss and this is it, what I won't miss.
Don't tell me it's alright. I'm never on your mind.
I can't pretend to try when you don't feel the same way.
I know you're mad, but we can work this out.
I wish I knew back then, I shouldn't have to fix me.
When you hit that lonely and lowest low, well, up's the only way left to go.
Maybe we started pretty small, but take a look at us now.
I look into the stars at night. The only substitution when it's not your eyes.
Heartbeat, it speeds up whenever you want me, what you got, I want it like all week.
Let go of how it has to be.
We got caught up in the colours, we got wrapped up in the ride.
We thought the feeling was forever and the stars were on our side.
It was lovely while it lasted, but it wasn't meant to stay.
You let yourself get carried away. I guess I let myself get carried away.
We got mixed up in the madness, but wasn't it a perfect mess we made?
You live and you learn, you read signs and it's safe and it's simple and behind our walls we fall back into place.
Back to Earth again. You're through with pretending cause this is how the ending goes. Now you're here where you belong.
It was lovely while it lasted, it was never meant to stay, but we let ourselves get carried away. I guess I let myself get carried away.
I don't care what they do, I just wanna be with you and I don't mind all the times we will fight just to get through.
All these empty faces, they got nothing on yours.
All the brightest places, they turn dark when you're gone.
You got that hometown smile, you got that look in your eyes that says everything will one day be alright.
You got that hometown smile, you got that look in your eyes and I'll do anything just to keep you by my side.
They can keep on talking, baby. You're the beat through the noise.
Lying still in this bed, but my heart is restless, chasing the last words you said.
Every bit of regret, I swallow with each breath. Wishing I had done more than what I had done.
Your memory, it shadows me, wherever I go and I wonder how I made it through another day alone.
Who I am without you is a bad dream cause I can't see the end of these tears I cry and I can't see the end of these sleepless nights, but I want to somehow.
Standing back against the wall, my heart is bleeding for your call. If I could only hear your voice again tonight.
I could show you all the joy you bring, not just feel you in my dreams.
I need you here right now, I need you, stay somehow.
I'm running out of crazy. Are you entertained yet?
Let me love you when your heart is tired.
You whisper "I'm alright", but I see through your white lies.
I'm in pieces, it's tearing me up, but I know a heart that's broke is a heart that's been loved.
I hope that I see the world as you did cause I know a life with love is a life that's been lived.
You say you don't wanna talk, you tell me to go take a walk. You don't wanna see my face right now, you don't care how I feel.
I just wanna know how you would feel if I never picked up the phone? You would feel so cold in this world all alone.
Tell me where you get the nerve to say I'm the one that made it end this way.
When you've got nowhere to go and you need someone to hold, I won't be there cause you let me go. I'll be moving on, I've got to be strong and you'll never know what there was in store.
You say you regret it all, you tell me that it's all your fault. Glad you figured out what it's all about, but it's too late now.
I might be better on my own, I hate you blowing up my phone. I wish I never met your ass, sometimes it be like that.
I'm not myself the nights you're gone, there ain't no way I'm moving on. I'm not afraid to need you bad, sometimes it be like that.
We both wanna love, we both wanna slide. We both wanna argue until we're both right and you want a hug, I kiss you goodnight.
Maybe we're both just out of our mind and you throw tantrums while I'm twisting up. No medicine is fixing us.
Won't do no thinking, I'm in love.
Got too much going to be upset. I swear, I'd rather be your friend. I said I'm gonna be right back. It hurts, sometimes it be like that.
Sometimes, when you thought you found the love of your life, now you're thinking I'm just one of those guys. Leading on, I can't help when you read it wrong.
Don't know why I trip on us. You put me down, I pick you up.
Sometimes when you're falling off track. Baby, don't you leave me like that.
I know that I'll be a mess the second that I see you. You won't be surprised, it happens everytime. It's nothing new.
It's always on a night like tonight, I thank God you can read my mind cause when you look at me with those eyes, I'm speechless.
I'm speechless. You already know that you're my weakness. After all this time I'm just as nervous everytime you walk into the room.
Ever since the day that we met you take the breath out of my lungs, can't even fight it and all of the words out of my mouth without even trying.
Here come the last line of our favourite song, it's the end of an era.
She's gone, moving on.
She ain't ever been that far from home, but I know she's better off gone.
She swears we'll end up together in the end. She wouldn't have to say that if she really thought that. The fact is she ain't coming back again.
Only good thing I ever had just up and gone away like that. I love her enough not to hold on. It's gonna break my heart, but I'll get along cause she's better off gone.
I am insensitive, I have a tendency to pay more attention to the things that I need. Sometimes I drink too much, sometimes I test your trust, sometimes I dunno why you stay with me.
I'm hard to love, I don't make it easy and I couldn't do it if I stood where you stood. I'm hard to love and you say that you need me, I don't deserve it, but I love that you love me good.
I am a short fuse, I am a wrecking ball crashing into your heart like I do. You're like a Sunday morning, full of grace. I wish that I could be more like you.
You've give nme a million second chances and I don't ever wanna take you for granted.
When I look into your eyes, it's like watching the night sky or a beautiful sunrise. Well, there's so much they hold.
Just like them old stars, I see that you've come so far to be right where you are.
Well, I won't give up on us, even if the skies get rough. I'm giving you all my love. I'm still looking up.
When you're needing your space to do some navigating, I'll be here patiently waiting to see what you find.
We got a lot to learn, God knows we're worth it.
I don't wanna be someone who walks away so easily. I'm here to stay and make the difference that I can make.
Our differences, they do a lot to teach us how to use the tools and gifts we got, we got a lot at stake.
In the end, you're still my friend, at least we did intend for us to work, we didn't break, we didn't burn.
We had to learn how to bend, without the world caving in. I had to learn what I got and what I'm not and who I am.
If you weren't so insecure, you'd learn to close each open door for me.
Hang up if you ever think of calling. Me up, not afraid to say it darling. Sorry, I'm not sorry if it hurts, I don't mean to make it worse. I've decided that I'm not your fucking friend.
Right now, there's not much that we agree on. Sit down if you need someone to lean on. Honest, if I'm coming to your place, it's to say it to your face. I've decided that I'm not your fucking friend.
Darling, watching me disappear. Ignorance is bliss I hear and I have always been sincere to you.
Nobody gets me like you. Couldn't keep hold of you then, how could I know what you meant? There was nothing to compare to.
I know everything changes, all the cities and faces, but I know how I feel about you.
There's a mountain between us, but there is one thing I'm sure of, that I know how I feel about you.
Can we bring yesterday back around? Cause I know how I feel about you now. I was dumb, I was wrong, I let you down, but I know how I feel about you now.
All that it takes, one more chance. Don't let our last kiss be our last, give me tonight and I'll show you.
Not a day passed me by when I don't think about you and there's no moving on cause I know you're the one and I can't be without you.
I don't really like myself without you, every song I sing is still about you. Save me from myself the way you used to cause I don't really like myself without you. I really wish I hated you.
A little drunk, waiting on your phone call. A little numb, maybe I can't feel at all.
You stitch me up, but you can't stop me bleeding out. I'm better when I'm broken.
I love you, but I hate you when you're with someone else. I don't want you wrapped around me, but I don't trust myself.
Won't you say something? I really wish I hated you.
I think about the future that we left behind. I drank it all, but I can't shake you from my mind. Now every window's broken.
I can see that you've had enough, I can see that you're giving up on me. I can see that your hands are up, I can see that you're giving up on me.
I hate the way that you're better off. I numb the pain, but it never stops. Wish I could say that I'm better off now.
People say I try too hard, people say I come off really awkward. You know, I don't mean no harm.
I'm just trying to be myself, but sometimes I get confused cause I can't read social cues.
Threw my inhibitions out the door. I don't have an excuse, I'm just living in my youth. Don't know why people don't like me more.
I have no friends, but that's ok. I don't need them anyway, I do my best all on my own and I'd just rather be alone.
I have no friends, but I'll be fine. I don't need them to pass the time and when I put my resting bitch face on, I look stone cold. I'd just rather be alone.
You'll never know what's on my mind, you'll never know the secrets that I'm keeping. I'll scare you off with my crazy eyes cause all I need is me myself and I don't got no shame cause my life is just a game.
Everybody thinks I'm strange, it's just something in my brain. Don't know who they're being normal for.
I don't need anybody's hand to hold at night. As long as I'm with me, I know I'll be alright cause I can't love no one else. Spent my love on just myself. Took this people-pleaser heart and I tore it all apart.
Have you ever wished you could rewind and pick up all the pieces of a life you left behind? Have you ever lived on borrowed time, knowing your mistakes are chasing you down from behind?
Don't hold me cause I am falling back down and I wouldn't wanna see you hit the ground.
Little darling, you found my heart in the lost and found, but the scars, they still follow me around.
I know it's hard to replace, but the feelings that you had for me will one day be erased and you will learn to move on. Like footprints in the snow are lost when the winter's gone.
The dark surrounds your heart and you're in free fall. Oh, you must let go of me cause if you keep me, you will lose it all.
I told myself I'd be fine without you on my mind cause you keep leaving, I'm not sleeping.
Only call when you're all alone. Wish I could, but I can't say no, so just come over, pull me closer, one last time. I know you know what you're doing, but I keep letting you do it.
You're no good for me, no, you keep messing with my head. You're no good for me at all. Is it wrong, I want you baby?
You're no good for me, no, I can't get you out my head. This won't last for long, but it feels good, so I don't care if you're bad for me.
Pick her up under city lights, all she wants to do is fight. Liquor on her lips, but when we kiss, I just don't seem to mind.
I know you're bad for me, so I don't care if you're bad for me.
I dont care if you hurt me baby. I don't care, so hurt me baby. I dont care if you hurt me baby. I dont care if you're bad for me.
You'll do whatever it takes to get her by your side.
Have you seen that girl? Have you seen her? With the way she moves, you wanna kiss her. She'll be the girl of your dreams if you can close your eyes.
You can feel that beat when she's in the room. You can feel your heart going boom boom.
I've been holding my breath, I've been counting to ten over something you said. I've been holding back tears, while you're throwing back beers. I'm alone in bed.
You know I'm afraid of change. Guess that's why we stay the same. So tell me to leave, I'll pack my bags, get on the road. Find someone that loves you better than I do, darling, I know.
You remind me every day I'm not enough, but I still stay.
I've done a lot of things wrong, loving you being one, but I can't move on.
Wanna believe that you don't have a bad bone in your body, but the bruises on your ego make you go wild. Wanna believe that even when you're stone cold, you're sorry. Tell me why you gotta be so outta your mind.
I know you're choking on your fears, already told you I'm right here. I will stay by your side every night.
I don't know why you hide from the one and close your eyes to the one. Mess up and lie to the one that you love. When you know you can cry to the one, always confide in the one, you can be kind to the one that you love.
I know you need the upper hand, even when we aren't fighting cause in the past, you had to prepare every time. Don't wanna leave, but if you're gonna fight, then do it for me.
I know you're built to love, but broken now, so just try.
When I fall in love, I usually take my time, hoping it gets better. Swipe left, swipe right to fill all of these lonely nights. It's just empty pleasure.
Don't text to come over, we don't talk when we're sover. Fairytale I could live without.
When I fall in love, I usually take my mind, hoping it gets better. Swipe left, swipe right, even people who ain't my type. It's just empty pleasure.
When I fall in love, I usually change my mind. Never understanding white lies, facetime. Is there someone else on your mind? Always end up stranded.
Playing with her emotions. Heart broke and we're frozen. Fairytale I could live without.
I don't need love, I just need love.
I've always been the one to say the first goodbye. Had to love and lose a hundred million times, had to get it wrong to know just what I like. Now, I'm falling.
Centre of attention, you know you can get whatever you want from me, whenever you want it, baby.
Am I falling in love with the one that could break my heart?
I wonder, when you go, if I stay on your mind. Two can play that game, but you win me every time. Everyone before you was a waste of time.
We been down this road before, broken glass and slamming doors. Let the neighbours think we started a world war.
We fight fight, but a heart can't lie. Ain't nothing in this world that will tear me away from your side. We could try to live separate lives, at the end of the day I'll be the one holding you tight.
Baby girl, we don't never need space. Need the touch of your cherry sweet taste of your lips on mine on a long, hot summer night.
I've been known to pick a few fights, you been known to speak your mind. When the morning comes, I still wake up next to you.
The truth can be twisted, but our fates are intwined. Whenever we've drifted, you stay by my side.
Ain't you one of them girls? Ask you to dance, you say 'No'. Just to see how far I'll go.
You got your heart on lockdown, got a wall I gotta knock down.
You're one of them girls that ain't tryna meet nobody, you're just here for the party. If I'm wrong then stop me.
You're one of them girls that ain't handing out your number, you like to make us want you. You like to make us wonder if you're one of them girls.
I'm one of them boys who'll trade his whole world for one of them girls who likes to act all quiet. Sexy, not even trying. You know I ain't lying.
You're one of them girls I wanna put my lips on, hold all night long, write a little love song for one of them girls.
You say what if I hurt you, what if I leave you. What if I find somebody else and I don't need you. What if this goes south, what if I mess you up. You say what if I break your heart in two, then what?
Before you make your mind up, I gotta ask what if I was made for you and you were made for me? What if this is it? What if it's meant to be? What if I ain't one of them fools just playing some game?
What if I pulled you close? What if I leaned in and the stars line up and it's our last first kiss?
What if one of these days, baby, I'd go and change your name?
What if I loved all these what ifs away?
What if the sky falls or the sun stops burning? We would worry about them what ifs til the world stops turning.
I could kiss you. What if you liked it? Well we ain't never gonna know unless we try it.
I know it's been a minute since you walked right through that door, but I still think about you all the time.
I don't know how I'm gonna blank it out. I don't know how you got me saying. Fuck, I'm lonely as fuck. Come hold me. It's been me, myself and why did you go?
I still watch the shows you showed me, I still drink that wine, but these days it tastes more bitter than sweet.
All my friends are way too drunk to save me from my phone, so sorry if I say some things I mean.
I don't know how I'm gonna make it out. I don't know how you got me saying. Fuck, I'm lonely as fuck. Come hold me. It's been me, myself and why did you go?
Miss those nights when you would come over, spend all night just trying to get closer. That was June and now it's October, I don't want to get over you.
I'll tell you a story before it tells itself, I'll lay out all my reasons you'll say that I need help.
We all got expectations and sometimes they go wrong, but no one listens to me.
They tell me think with my head, not that thing in my chest. They got their hands at my neck this time, but you're the one that I want, if that's really so wrong. They don't know what this feeling is like.
I'll tell them a story, they'll sit and nod their heads. I tell you all my secrets and you tell all your friends. Hold on to your opinions and stand by what you said.
In the end, it's my decision, so it's my fault when it ends.
Why do I do this? Pick you up and put you down and put you through this.
Started off as a good thing, a sure thing. You held back, but I know in the moment our lips touched the rush sent us straight to the moon. I should've known that we'd be coming down.
Right to the bottom, where we are now. Started off as a good thing, a sure thing, what the hell did I do?
Everytime I think I love somebody, always find a way to throw it all away.
I don't ever wanna hurt nobody, I don't wanna be the one to say that we gotta have a conversation. I don't wanna watch the tears roll down your face.
Know I hurt you and I'm sorry. All I wanted was to love somebody.
Young love, thought it wasn't a phase.
Maybe settle down and I'd make you my wife and then everything changed in the blink of an eye.
It's hard when you face the truth, inside and out, so don't go on blaming yourself.
Baby, I know this might sound crazy, when I drive by your place lately, the lights keep coming on. Why the lights keep coming on?
Been six months since I saw you and I know we're moving on.
So close, I remember the days when we went and bought a couch and we got our new place. We were sleeping on the floor cause we both couldn't wait. It was straight out of a movie with the look on your face.
The pain got deep and it started to cut. Tell me, how'd it come to this when it started as love? I knew I couldn't stay cause I wasnt enough for you.
Moving on, I thought it'd break me. Everything I lost.
I wanna live life fast, I don't know how to slow down, wanna get high, I don't know how to come down. Help me now, I'm running on empty and I don't wanna be a memory.
Am I the only one that's coming unglued? Emotions building up, they start to run you. The bottles on the shelf I'm about to run through. Doing everything I wish that I can do undo.
I'm by myself and why won't no one help? I know this can't be healthy, so I'm looking for a way out.
Tryna find the beauty in the letdown, going through my texts now, tryna find the things I never said to prove a point. I'ma roll my feelings in a joint.
Pieces of the story that got left out, I checked out. Wish it was, I wish it was a phase. Nothing you could do and there's nothing you could say. Running from the pain, I gotta get away.
I miss you and I know better.
I need to hear something happy, but I'd rather keep driving and crying and wondering why when I know there's no reason.
Some people come and go like seasons.
It's hell right now, but I know somehow I'll get over you and then some day I'll hear this song and I won't even think about thinking about you.
I'll get over you and then somebody's gonna love me like you didn't. Every kiss will get me closer to closure. Trust me, I ain't just gonna get over you.
I reach out and try to play it again, only to find it's on the radio and won't rewind. Kinda like us in time.
It sucks right now, but I know somehow I'll get over you and then some day I'll hear this song and I won't even think about thinking about you.
Hey, baby, what's the truth, how you really feel? Smile on your face looks a little too real. I can call out when you're bluffing, but I'm not sure. If you faking it, girl, you deserve an oscar.
Serve me right taking you for granted like that, letting you go thinking, nah, she coming right back. Girl, I hope he ain't nothing like the old me. Hey congrats, girl, you told me.
I'm looking for a dream on a mean machine with hell in his eyes. He's gonna be wild as the wind.
If it takes forever, then I'll wait forever. No oridinary boy, no ordinary boy is gonna do.
That's the way it's gonna be, that's the way that I feel. I want a whole lot more than the boy next door. I want hell on wheels.
If he's cool enough, he can burn me through and through.
They don't know what I'm looking for, they don't know what I need.
You're gonna know it when he gets here cause the ground will be shaking.
I'll do anything to let him know that I'm his, his for the taking.
I'm all dressed up in my finest attitude pretending I don't care.
Why can't I be just what I am and speak my love without any shame? Why can't she see what I am? Is a costumed fool trapped in a tragic game?
Charades and pretty lies, they hide what's deep inside me. Charades do disguise all the love I keep inside. Charades can't see me, but you can feel the real me.
Charades can't see me, but you can feel the real me. Can't you feel the real me behind my charades? Have I lost the real me behind my charades?
No more midnight rides with you, no more secret rendezvous. I'm gonna miss all the things we'll never do.
Remember, I love you, I won't be far away. Baby, close your eyes and think of yesterday and we'll be there together.
Baby, don't you know it's hard to let you go? Save all your dreams and keep me in your heart.
It hurts to say goodbye, no matter how I try. Love will survive even though we have to part.
It all seems so unfair. Just when I found you, I lost you. That doesn't matter now, the only thing that matters is the time we had together.
The only thing you have to know is that I love you and you're the only one who can keep our love alive.
Remember, I love you, you won't be far away. I just close my eyes and bring back yesterday and we'll be there together.
You were the one, the one in my dreams, but I never knew it. I wanted to tell you time and again, but I couldn't do it. All that you are is all that I need, no more pretending.
We'll be together, always together. Like birds of a feather, forever and ever.
I like what you got, I guess it's ok if you wanna show it. I am what I am and I'm all for you, just want you to know it.
You tell me that you need me, then you go and cut me down.
You tell me that you're sorry, didn't think I'd turn around and say that it's too late to apologise
I'd take another chance, take a fall, take a shot for you and I need you like a heart needs a beat, but it's nothing new.
I loved you with a fire red, now it's turning blue and you say sorry like the angel. Heaven let me think it was you.
If I woke up without you, I don't know what I would do. Thought I could be single forever til I met you.
You got a way of keeping me coming back to back.
When you kiss me, I know you don't give two, but I still want that.
Baby, I hope that this ain't karma cause I get around. You wanna run it up, I wanna lock it down.
The best thing about tonight's that we're not fighting, could it be that we have been this way before? I know you don't think that I am trying.
Hold your breath because tonight will be the night that I will fall for you over again.
Don't make me change my mind or I won't live to see another day, I swear it's true because a girl like you is impossible to find.
This is not what I intended, I always swore to you I'd never fall apart. You always thought that I was stronger. I may have failed, but I have loved you from the start.
Breathe in so deep. Breathe me in, I'm yours to keep and hold on to your words cause talk is cheap and remember me tonight when you're asleep.
I won't listen to you, do what I wanna do and I will walk this road ahead one hundred miles on my hands. Do I need to show you? Guess I gotta show you.
If you don't believe me now, I'll flip the whole world upside down. Do I need to show you? Guess I gotta show you.
Oh girl, you make them run. You must be three if you ain't the one cause I know three words to replace the sun.
Oh girl, you make them run. Yea, this trust never tripping up. This love ever living up. Never had to flex for you, got fresh, catch a bus just to hit you up.
Hey pretty baby with the sun in your eye, you make me feel like I'm up in the sky. I wanna tell you , wanna make you mine.
I'm all talk with a thorn in my side, I got a real big heart that I'm willing to hide.
You ask me what I want from life, I said to make a lot of money and feel dead inside.
Hey pretty baby, can you feel that heat? You got me twitching to the edge of my seat.
Make me feel like I might go wild.
I tell you I just like you for your smile.
You asked me, "What do I think of life?". I said, "Baby, not much, I wanna die."
Said I'd never fall, but then I fell for you.
Back against the wall, that's how it felt with you.
Let's get tattoos together, something to remember. If it's way too soon, fuck it, whatever. Give me shapes and letters. If it's not forever, then at least we'll have tattoos together.
I could never love nobody else the way I loved you, baby.
I've been hoping, praying we last forever cause there's nothing better than you and I.
If there was ever a chance to tell you that I think about you every single day, I don't know if I could take that chance.
You show up when I hear that song or I finally start watching that TV show.
I don't know why every time that I think of home, I can picture you standing in the cold, but I'm scared cause I don't know if you and I are in the same boat.
If you asked out of the blue how I truly feel about you, I don't have a clue how that would go. If I had the chance, would I really tell you?
Times like this, I wish I never existed. Nobody wants to listen.
Times like this, I wish that I could let go and open up a window, free to be myself.
How does it feel to know that I don't care at all? Your words don't mean a thing at all. I choose to ride, you choose to fall.
How does it feel to know that I am capable of more than you will ever know?
Don't tell me I'm not good enough, don't you bring me down. I'm moving up and you're over now.
You gave me fire everytime you came around.
My feet are steady on the ground and you won't knock me down.
Times like this, I'm picking up the pieces. I'm making up the reasons not to tell a soul.
Times like this, I'd rather speak to no one. I just wanna move on and stand up on my own.
What goes around comes around like a yo-yo.
Wish that I could stop time like a photo, but we stand strong, bounce back like a pogo.
She'll make it out, but she's never the same. She's looking down at the scars that remain, but you hold your ground.
When all she needs, when all she wants, when all she finds, when all she is, and ever was is compromised.
There's no one to love her when you build your walls too high and there's no one to love you when you build your walls too high.
When you're all alone, you wait and you hide.
There's no one who is strong enough to save your love. There's no fairytale.
If I had a chance, I'd take it faster than a heartbeat.
If I caught a glance, I'd run to you like nobody was watching.
It's hard for everyone to understand it, but you're in my heart.
You're never gonna love me, so what's the use?
What's the point in playing a game you're gonna lose?
What's the point in saying you love me like a friend?
What's the point in saying it's never gonna end?
You're too proud to say that you made a mistake, you're a coward to the end.
Why don't we just pretend? Lies. Don't wanna know, I can't let you go.
I just want it to be perfect, to believe it's all been worth the fight.
Only if we're drinking can you see my spark.
Those hardest to love need it most.
Such good friends, it has to end, it always does. That's the way life is. Do we take that risk?
We've got our aim, but we might miss. We are too fragile just to guess and I've been in this place before, fine as we are, but we want more. That's human nature at it's best.
What if we ruin it all, and we love like fools and all we have we lose? I don't want you to go, but I want you so tell me what we choose.
I want you more than I've wanted anyone. Isn't that dangerous?
Got to be a lot that's wrong with you to want to be with me.
We're fighting til someone's calling the cops, but you never blame it on me.
I only love you when you don't love me, so why do you love me? I only need you when you don't need me, so why do you love me?
Apologise, never apologise. You hate the way I lie, so here you go, I'm being honest.
I'm fucking crazy, you're fucking crazy, we're all fucking crazy.
She's surreal. She's dangerous and no one else can match those eyes.
She's concealed. So mysterious that nobody can catch her lies.
Stop this game of fame, no one can win.
I believe this can be serious if I can get under her skin.
Our love was just a masquerade.
Every time we sit around and talk, I try to turn her inside out. I get closer, but still miles away from getting what she's all about.
If you don't like it, you can leave it.
I'ma do just what I want on the regular.
Your happiness don't need a censor.
If I hear one more person tell me that I'll be okay and the pain I'm feeling now is just the price we pay when you love someone, but have to walk away.
Don't say you didn't mean it, I'm not breaking down. You don't deserve it.
Don't look at me with sad eyes and pretend you're still mine.
Once that trust is gone, you feel dead inside.
This thing called love can be so cold. It can be miserable or it can be beautiful.
This thing called love can be so cold. Sometimes it's amazing, sometimes it's crazy.
Your love is like a drug that everybody uses. You wanna know the outcome, depends on how you use it.
Love could be your bestfriend, love can be your enemy. Love can be the thing you wish you had, but you don't ever see. Love can be the reason why you're afraid to have it.
One minute it's saving you, next it's trying to drown you.
Your love is like a privilege. A lot of us abuse it, do with it what we want and start crying when we lose it. Pretend like it ain't nothing to us, pretend like it's useless.
You know if that person hurt you, you gonna lose it all. They told you they would be there for you, they don't even call. So that openness you used to have has now become a wall.
Afraid to go confront it all.
What do I live for? I can't take much more, I shouldn't have been born.
Sometimes solutions aren't so simple. Sometimes goodbye's the only way.
Sometimes beginnings aren't so simple. Sometimes goodbye's the only way.
You used to tell me that you loved me once. What happened?
You're lying and you know I know.
Baby, what have we become? What happened?
You can take this heart, heal it or break it all apart.
Do you remember when you told me you loved me once? What happened?
I could still be the only one you need. The only one close enough to feel you breathe. I could still be that place where you run, instead of the one that you're running from.
When the world leaves you feeling blue, you can count on me. I will be there for you.
When it seems all your hopes and dreams are a million miles away, I will reassure you.
Good friends are there for each other. Never, ever forget that I got you.
Climb every mountain higher. Reach for the stars, follow your heart's desire.
Drive that open road, leave the past behind you. Don't stop, you got to keep moving, your hopes have got to keep building.
You broke up with me, for the life of me, I couldn't figure out what I did wrong.
I'm so sorry, I'm usually the first one to admit I did wrong.
Get over yourself, what's your problem?
We had chemistry and you're the one that got away and I'll never forget you.
Lay down your pride, wipe that tear from your eye.
Baby, when I look in your eyes, there's no way that I can disguise all these crazy thoughts in my mind.
Don't ever stop controlling me. I kinda like it when you bring me to my knees.
I don't ever wanna give up all this spell you got me under.
I kinda knew you were troublesome. You got me wrapped around your finger like bubblegum.
Sometimes you're a stranger in my bed. Don't know if you love me or you want me dead. Push me away, then beg me to stay.
Every little lie gives me butterflies.
Something in the way you're looking through my eyes, don't know if I'm gonna make it out alive.
Late night devil, put your hands on me and never ever let go.
Some days you're the best thing in my life. Sometimes when I look at you, I see my wife.
You're looking at me like you don't know who I am.
Steal her heart from the stars, gotta have a master plan.
I can't believe I found the one who fits me like a glove.
I remember every sunset, I remember every word you said and we were never gonna say goodbye.
I'll be there in a heartbeat.
I can't stop these feelings melting through and I'd give away a thousand days just to have another one with you.
When I play, I never stay.
You better get away darling cause everything you heard is true.
Darling, if you ever leave me, I'll just put my heart away. I couldn't love again, believe me. No one could please me anyway.
If another ever came along, I'd just turn them down cause after all I've been loved by the best, I can't settle down for less. Why both with the rest?
If you ever get tired of me, I won't look for someone new cause looking back on how you loved me, no one could measure up to you.
If they try to win this heart of mine, I just have to say don't waste your time.
When I look into your eyes I know you're the only love I ever want cause after you and me, baby, I can see nothing else could be even close.
I will not waver, I will not wait its turn. It will beat, it will burn your love into the ground with the lips of another.
You're sick of all those other imitators, don't let the only real one intimidate you.
I've been looking for somebody, not just any fucking body.
I'm jumping off a sinking ship. I guess I should have read the stars, I wouldn't know that it would end like this.
You never made me decent, you never made me strong. You never let me finish. No, you ne- I throw my hands up, I've already made my mind up.
Been driving down a dead-end street. Do I let another dragon fly? Gonna sweep another off her feet.
I've already made my mind up, sorry I've messed your life up. I'ma get on with mine.
I can't tell what you're thinking, please tell me what you're thinking. Last night, we were more than fine, just tell me if you changed your mind.
I'm calling, no answer. Would you text me when you feel like? When it feels right to you?
If you're looking at me with a heart of doubt: don't kiss me right now, don't tell me that you need me.
Don't show up at my house all caught up in your feelings. Don't run me round and round. Don't build me up just to let me down.
Don't mess with my head, don't tell me you're falling with your feet still on the ledge. I'm all out of breath. Baby, don't run me round and round.
Don't kiss me, no, don't kiss me right now. On your lips, just leave it if you don't mean it.
You know you've got me in the palm of your hand, but I love those hands, but you only let me hold you when he can't. I don't understand.
Don't take yourself so seriously.
Look at you all dressed up for someone you never see.
I wonder why I tear myself down to be built back up again.
All that's left of myself, holes in my false confidence.
Don't let those demons in again. I fill the void up with polished doubt, fake sentiment.
Why won't you take me seriously?
Look at me all fucked up over someone I'll never meet.
Do you need someone? Are you scared of what's to come? If you leave then who will the next one be? Will he do the same or will he let you see?
You don't have to hurt anymore. With a little time, take a look and find what you're searching for.
You are broken on the floor and you're crying. He has done this all before, but you're lying to yourself that he'll find help, that he will change to someone else.
Will you leave, or will you carry on? Is your love from before still strong? If you leave, will you keep the memory? That made the night so long, the cut so deep?
There's a girl, but I let her get away. It's all my fault cause pride got in the way and I'd be lying if I said I was okay.
I keep saying, no, this can't be the way it was supposed to be. I keep saying, no, there's got to be a way to get you close to me.
You gotta speak up if you want somebody, can't let them get away. You don't wanna end up sorry, the way that I'm feeling every day.
There's a girl, but I let her get away. It's all my fault cause I said I needed space and I've been torturing myself night and day.
You don't wanna lose that love, it's only gonna hurt too much.
I see your monsters, I see your pain. Tell me your problems, I'll chase them away. I'll be your lighthouse, I'll make it okay.
I can't imagine losing you.
I can't explain this, so I'll keep it all inside. Wear my pain, but it's masked by my pride.
Said you'd come right back, now you're gone like that.
I want nobody else, but it's hard to get to know me when I don't know myself.
I can swear, I can joke. I say what's on my mind.
There's more to me than people know.
Don't mind all my friends, I know they're all crazy, but they're the only friends that I have.
Stupid words keep falling from my mouth.
I'm known to go a little too fast.
Is it bad that I'm hoping that you're broken? Is it bad that I'm wishing you're still broken? That you haven't found fish in the ocean.
All alone, damn, I wish I didn't know you.
I know I'm the stupid one who ended it and now I'm the stupid one regretting it.
Is it wrong if I ask you to come over? Is it wrong if I tell you that I love you?
Scared of moving on, but you're already gone. So if you're moving on, won't you just tell me.
You'll always be my number one, a whole lot more than good enough.
With you, I'm happy being me. Don't pretend cause I don't need to.
I'd have all I need if you were standing right in front of me. I'll finally see what it means to be complete.
I'd have all I need if you'd be the better half of me.
Will you be the better half of me?
That's a whole lotta love, ain't tryna waste it like we be running a mile to never make it.
Maybe it's your love, it's too good to be true.
You know your love is big enough, make me trip up on you.
I tripped on your love, now I'm addicted.
Would I be crazy if I thought the world was fake? A game, a simulation aliens play from outer space.
Maybe I'm just sick and tired of doing the same shit every time.
I get so nostalgic caught up in all this magic.
Let's raise a gladd to future and past. The cheers to love lost, a smile for every teardrop.
Even though it's been so long, it's like you're still here.
Truth will set me free, I know, but what's the point if I got no one to talk to? No one I look up to.
When I met you, I was stuck, but slowly I could talk about what I've been through. Feels good when I'm with you.
You brought out the deepest, all the words without a meaning.
I've been lost, been broken hearted, but with you, I can talk about it. You're the reason.
You stretched my heart so I could feel the road we're on is ours and nothing can break it. Should I be afraid, yea?
I have tried it all, been drinking holy water. Now you're here by my side, so I'll trust you now.
I am just like you, I have been there too. Wake up feeling worse than yesterday. I'm pretty fucking far from being okay.
I can't help but feeling like I should change.
You'll be the saddest part of me, a part of me that will never be mine.
You're still the oxygen I breathe. I see your face when I close my eyes. It's torturous.
There's just one thing I hope you know, I loved you so.
I dont even care about the time I've got left here. The only thing I know now is that I want to spend it with you.
I just keep on thinking how you made me feel better and all the crazy little things that we did together.
I'm kinda shy, but you're super fly. I could be your kryptonite.
You're like a breath of fresh air in my lungs. You and me dance from the night to the dawn.
I've seen a lot of things in life that words can't explain. See, we ain't any different, but we just ain't the same.
People only use you when you let them. Well, if that's the case, then I'm the one to blame.
Why won't anybody answer my question? Why is the silence so loud?
You only went and made me bitter, I wish I wasn't such a giver.
I feel a sound, but I can't hear it. That's my heart strings getting played like a symphony.
Found you someone you could have just temporarily.
I knew every part about you from your head to your toes, from your heart to your soul.
Why you gotta be that honest for? I ain't hold your heart no more. Why you gotta make me insecure?
Who's loving you? Who's touching you? I dont wanna know right now. Who's texting you? God damn.
Who's loving you? Who's touching you? Who's texting you? Who's sexting you? I dont wanna know.
She got me going psycho. She got me going down, got me living on a tightrope.
I might say too much.
I'm only interested. Baby, I'm infatuated.
You been held back, I'll get you to graduation.
I'm crazy and you crazy too, but I love that shit. You're bad and you're broken too, but I love that shit. Just be open to the possibility of me and you.
Oh, my love, don't you worry when the world gets cold, I'll hold your heart when it's heavy.
It's hard to make it when you're on your own.
If you get lost, then I will lead you home and all you need to know is I'll be there when no one is, yea darling.
I feel like I've become my own mistakes. All of my demons keep me wide awake, but then I hear you say I'll be there when no one is.
Til my blood runs dry, I will never leave your side.
I believe that life is worth it, even if it's scarred or frayed. You don't need to be whole or perfect, no one is.
You never know where the tide's gonna take us. You never know when the wave's gonna break, but I'll be there.
Hope when you take that jump, you don't fear the fall.
Hope when the water rises, you built a wall.
Hope when the crowd screams out, it's screaming your name.
Hope if everybody runs, you choose to stay.
Hope that you fall in love and it hurts so bad.
The only way you can know, you give it all you have.
I hope that you don't suffer, but take the pain.
Hope when the moment comes, you'll say I did it all. I owned every second that this world could give, I saw so many places, the things that I did. With every broken bone, I swear, I lived.
Hope that you spend your days, but they all add up.
I wish that I could witness all your joy and all your pain, but until my moment comes, I'll say I did it all.
Undercover lovers, lost in your eyes. Swimming in your mystery, a sweet fantasy.
Beating hearts like thunder, feeling so high at the top of this rollercoaster.
It's our time.
Maybe I'm not supposed to let my lips touch your lips, but if it's alright, I just might.
Feels like all of my life, been searching for a sign.
You could be with anyone you wanted, you couLd. Take that job they offered and move down by the ocean, but I love the way your hand feels when it's under mine.
I don't wanna take the world for granted while I'm still trying to understand it.
The more I live, I am convinced, everyone just wants to be in love.
No one tried to take the time it takes to turn your love into a love or friends into a family.
I don't want any false religion, I will practice loving you with no conditions.
I'll give up what I have, just so I can have you.
Everybody's chasing something, but they don't know they're chasing someone.
I may never be a politician, or make a lot of money, hold a high position. Baby, you're my mission and all my glory days are yours.
Oh, won't you stay with me, darling. I've been out in the cold. I went away trying to find a heart I could hold, but I've been lonely, so give me something tonight.
I know that I have made mistakes, I've been the cause of a heartbreak. I know that I am hard to love, that's why I'd never ask for much.
I've been told that I trust more than I should, still, I close my eyes and say that you could.
I've been through wars that left me scarred, I've been called a fool for chasing hearts. All the loves I found could never grow. Now, I spend too many nights alone.
I like my company, but I could do with yours. I like you next to me, so give me something more.
Parts of you I've come to learn. Slowly now, your pages turn. I wanna read between your lines, every word and every rhyme.
I've been working on myself, never been the type to ask for help from somebody else. You came out of nowhere like a hurricane, pull me in and kiss me in the rain and I fell for you.
I wanna see the whole damn world with you, baby. Yea, you could be the one, girl, you driving me crazy.
I find all my inspiration thinking about you.
You call me up. It's like a broken record, saying that your heart hurts. That you'll never get over him getting over you and you end up crying and I end up lying.
I'm just a sucker for anything that you do.
I'm going in circles again and again.
I'm right here, when you gonna realise that I'm your cure?
I wanna scream out. You could be with me now.
You're not ready and it's so frustrating.
Lying isn't better than silence.
Floating, but I feel like I'm dying.
No matter where I go, at the end of every road, you were good to me.
I know it's easier to run, after everything I've done.
Leaving isn't better than trying.
Growing, but I'm just growing tired.
I'm worried for my soul and I'm still scared of growing old.
I'm so used to letting go, but I don't wanna be alone.
I'm closing every door cause I'm sick of wanting more.
Swear I'm different than before, I won't hurt you anymore cause you were good to me.
Summer comes, winter fades. Here we are, just the same.
Don't need pressure, don't need change.
There used to be an empty space, a photograph without a face, but with your presence and your grace, everything falls into place.
Please don't say you love me cause I might not say it back. Doesn't mean my heart stops skipping when you look at me like that.
Heavy words are hard to take. Under pressure precious things can break and how we feel is hard to fake.
Fools rush in and I've been a fool before. This time I'm gonna slow it down cause I think this could be more, the thing I'm looking for.
It may be hard for you to stop and believe, but for you I'd leave it all.
Give me one good reason why I should never make a change.
Baby, if you hold me, then all of this will go away.
If you just say the words I'll up and run to you.
My friends and family, they don't understand. They fear they'll lose so much if you take my hand, but for you I'd lose it all.
I was left to my own devicesl, many days fell away with nothing to show.
Grey clouds roll over the hills bringing darkness from above.
If you close your eyes, does it almost feel like nothing changed at all?
If you close your eyes, does it almost feel like you've been here before?
How am I gonna be an optimist about this?
We were caught up and lost in all of our vices.
Where to we begin? The rubble or our sins?
Part of me wants to love you, part of me knows I can't. A part of me is trying, but part of me isn't there.
I don't want to hurt you, but I know I will. A part of me wonders if you'll love me still.
Part of me runs to yo, a part of me falls behind. A part of me tries to turn back at the finish line.
No, I don't want to fail you, but I know I will. A part of me wonders why you love me still.
This time it's forever, I know more than ever that I got it right.
Sweet dreams tell me nothing, I need hope in something and I found it right here with you.
Part of me wants to follow, a part of me is letting go. A part of me is still hiding, a part of me you don't know.
I don't want to give up, I just know I will. A part of me wonders how you love me still.
I love you, I hate it.
I'll say it if you say it, but I won't go first.
Let's go get lost on a long back road where the river turns to streams and the time moves slow. It's not anything you say, anywhere we go. It's just being alone with you.
When we're not together, I think about you all the time. I keep your picture in my wallet to remind me that you're mine.
Life is not worth living, unless you're right here by my side. I'll love you now and forever and until the day I die.
Tired of being alone, calling you on the phone. I'd rather have you here with me.
Hey Baby, I'm missing you like crazy.
These arms, they feel so empty, without you here inside. This heart, it can't do nothing, without your love supply.
Just me and my morning coffee, thinking about how you got me inside your heart, wherever you are.
Baby, now don't you worry, I'll come running to you in a hurry when you reappear, I'll be waiting here.
I have seen it all in paper dreams, watched it unfold on the screen, but never understood.
I have heard you speak a million words, now you're talking to me first, never thought you would.
Oh, my, my, you just took me by surprise and I can't believe my eyes.
Oh, no, my, you're too good to be all mine.
I was young, my heart was always on the run, but you made loving fun. I never knew it could be.
I see you from a different point of view. Feel it's too good to be true. I found my missing piece.
Oh, my, my, when I look into your eyes, it's a sight I can't describe.
Threw a line out to pull you to me, if you don't get it, then you don't get it. You made your mind up before you knew me.
Take my hand for a minute, we're in it. Imagine all the pain that might be forgiven.
What if I had your hearT? What if you wore my scars? How would we break down? What if you were me and what if I were you?
What if you told my lies? What if I cried with your eyes? Could anyone keep us down? What if you were me? What if I were you?
Had a dream of a new tomorrow, if you don't get it, then you don't get it. I took a step hoping you might follow, if you don't get it, then you don't get it.
To the ones who make it better, find to get out, gotta touch the other side. What if all that it took to save our lives together was to rise up?
What if your hand was in my hand? Would you hold on or let go? What if your life was my life? Can you love what we don't know?
What if your hand was my hand? Could we hold on or let go? What if your life was my life? And what if I were you?
Time won't always make things better, you can't fake a smile forever. Are you really doing alright?
Everything inside you wanted. You tried your best to come the longing, but there's certain things you can't deny.
Pictures of before haunt you daily.
Perfect was within your reach, but your mind running, your heart couldn't keep up.
It's not too late to change the story. You could rearrange it only if letting go of fears is what you decide.
Can't help, but they dream, thoughts keep racing. You almost wanna scream, you're yearning for it.
If you stay, I swear that we will make it okay and if you go, just know that I've tried.
Give me the song inside your soul, give me the words to sing along. Show me the love that we used to know, show me the love.
We've got a long, long way to go. If we never try, we'll never know and I will hold us together til I can't hold on no more.
Oh, how I've learned so much from our time. All I see are the things you've given to me and I'm no longer scared to roll the dice.
I will not faulter, I will not break. I'll hold my ground under the weight. I will not waiver, I will not shake. I'm searching for the steps to take.
Words are lost, mouths are closed. Even through the silent pause, you take it all.
Table talks, gettign through the car ride home. It could be a late night call, you take it all.
You leave me room for my imperfections. I'm a mess and you jump right in. If I drift in the wrong direction, you turn the tide and you calm the wind.
Anytime, everytime I get lost, you will find me.
Faint applause, empty rooms. Even when the crowds are gone, you take it all. Lines are crossed. Even when my mind's consumed, I never mean to bruise your heart, but you take it all.
Our life wasn't always quite like this. Used to kick back and relax, yea, it was pure bliss. Suddenly things changed and our life was rearranged. Every moment goes by so fast.
Can we slow down time? Just you and I. Lights are flashing, people move, but when I look into your eyes, we can slow down time.
Our life is busier these days, we can't keep track of the memories we make. The scenery will change, will you still love me the same? Let's freeze the moment before it's past.
Your eyes make me wanna make this evening last.
Put on an old song, put on that new dress. Tomorrow's coming, but it ain't here yet.
Let me show you, I was made to hold you.
My heart beats fast when we're moving slow. Just one touch sends me out of control. Whatever you do, baby, don't let go.
Like you already knew me, that's why we get along. Yea, I know that this will never go wrong.
It's cinematic in the way we connected. Girl, you're so familiar, I never expected you to be right in my arms and my favourite part.
Something about the sound of you is stuck in my head. I'm hopelessly romanticizing all that you said.
Even though I see that I'm in too deep, I still gotta let you know that I never wanted anyone more. Falling forwards onto the floor, feels like I've felt this feeling before.
We can keep on going like we haven't seen the ending. Living in a dream, but we're not pretending. I don't wanna wake up. No, I don't want it to stop.
Night after night, you drive me a little bit crazy, so do I. I guess crazy attracts crazy.
Baby, this feels right, coming home to you every night. No more goodbyes, now we say goodnight.
Baby, this feels right, even when we get in fights. I know we'll be alright.
Baby, your love keeps me living, your gift keeps on giving.
Baby, this feels right, I knew that you were mine from the second that you walked in.
I love losing track of time, any time that we're talking.
You make loving you so easy, you make loving me seem easy.
We'll be okay if we text every day.
We'll be fine when all the stars align for you and I, but darling, I'll believe it when I see it.
The words you say just feel so far away from being honest. We slip away, I'm losing faith with every broken promise.
I'm trying, I'm trying, but do you really want it?
Don't say it's bad timing, then tell me that we got this.
The way you say I love you, I don't think you mean it. You say you mean it, I'll believe it when I see it.
I see myself with you and no one else, in parallel, but I can tell it's not the same for you.
The way you move from I miss you to let's not talk about it is not the same way my heart breaks when I can't be around you.
If we done met when we were younger, would've had more time making memories.
All those sunsets I've seen, would've looked so much better if we were together.
I know we've got forever, but I wish forever was longer than all the stories ever told cause those pages have endings, but I can't let you go.
I wish seconds felt like hours, wish time wouldn't fly by quite as fast.
If I could get some kind of superpower, it'd be making every minute, every moment last.
All those movies I've seen would've been so much better if we were together.
A whole lifetime of you and me, love, still won't be long enough.
For me, the stars are aligning, but for her, it's bad timing, so she just can't be mine.
I don't think that I like her anymore. Girls are all the same, all they wanna do is break my heart.
I don't think that I like her anymore. Girls are all the same, they just wanna see me fall apart.
I'm trying not to be bitter, but damn it, I'll miss her cause she's one of a kind.
You are patient, you are kind, so I thought I finally got it right this time.
You are lovely and full of life, but honestly, I felt it wasn't right.
I don't wanna give up on love. I know I'm not alone, but when I'm alone, it's so rough and it's so much.
Took a chance, it didn't really work out, doesn't mean that there's nobody to find now.
I've been waiting, been chasing and every night I'm praying for things I only write about in songs. Someone to walk beside, is that so wrong?
I only wanna trust in whatever your hand designs. I don't want the control and I'm not needing to be anxious when that is a waste of time.
You've got a hold on me, don't even know your power. I stand a hundred feet, but I fall when I'm around you.
Show me an open door, then you go and slam it on me. I can't take anymore.
Baby, please have mercy on me, take it easy on my heart. Even though you don't mean to hurt me, you keep tearing me apart.
I'd drive through the night just to be near you, baby.
Tell me that I'm not crazy. I'm not asking for a lot, just that you're honest with me. My pride is all I got.
I'm a puppet on your string and even though you got good intentions, I need you to set me free.
Consuming all the air inside my lungs, ripping all the skin from off my bones. I'm prepared to sacrifice my life. I would gladly do it twice.
I got no more drama in my life and it's such a blessing. I'm so glad I finally realised I'm better without you.
I got no more drama in my life and it's been amazing. I'm so glad I finally realised I'm better without you.
Took a year before I recognised that our love had already died. Baby, I was down bad, now I'm healing.
Some nights, you would stay here. Some nights, you would disappear. Now, I'll never go back, never go back to that feeling.
Baby, I ain't even wondering about everything we could've been ever since you looked me in my eyes, turned around and said goodbye.
You start fights while we're up late, use your lips to manipulate. Baby, how'd you do that? Make me need it.
Some nights, you were 'baby'. Some nights, it was crazy. Now, I'll never go back, never go back to that feeling.
I could love you a little bit louder, say that I'm not happy without you. Guess I'm afraid you'll run away when I start loving you louder.
I can be cold, so out of reach. You say I'm hard to believe. All in my head, and nothing said gets through to me.
So if it feels like we're fading, getting so tired of all this waiting. I've seen a million words, screaming out every verse that you know.
I could kiss you a little bit harder, hold your hand so that you know that I want you. Guess I'm afraid you'll run away when I start loving you louder.
It's getting too old, these feelings on hold, maybe it's time to let it show. There's so much love, burns like a fire inside of me.
Done messing up your head cause this time, no roses will do for you.
Oh, baby, shame on me, shame on me for loving you so desperately and I put the blame on me, blame on me for loving you so selfishly.
If you leave me now, I think I'd die of a broken heart cause baby, your face, a work of art.
There's seven billion people in the world and all I want is you.
I'd go maniac if you walked out, it's true.
Tattooed your name under my eyes, so everyone knows you're mine.
I'm so done taking my own advice cause I'm not too good at goodbyes.
Shame on me, shame on me for loving you so desperately and I want the world to see that I would lose my sanity for you, baby.
I could see the tension when you said 'Hello', it was the look you gave me when he stepped out for a smoke. Do you really love him? I think you know.
He don't appreciate you and that's what kills me the most.
You're perfect, he's so full of shit. You need someone equivalent. It's obvious he isn't it and I don't get it.
Why? Tell me why don't you break up with that guy? Cut the cord, say goodbye cause you keep messing my mind up. Know I could treat you better, what's taking you forever?
I think tonight, you should break up with that guy.
Baby, let me love you every way he's not. It's pretty clear to me that he doesn't know what he's got.
So close, it hurts, I'm sick of it.
Oh, when I get old, I'll be looking back, wishing it could last forever. Oh, yesterday, seems so far away.
It feels just like we're stuck inside a picture frame. These memories never fade away.
Whisper to me, we got the world right at our feet and I just wanna sit right here and look at you. That's probably all I ever do.
Where did it go? All of the nights, all the time we spent together.
Wake up and smile cause your beautiful.
High hopes, big dreams and a little scared. Way too naive, thinking you always be mine and never leave my side. At least these memories never say goodbye.
Someday, I'm running out of time. I'll see your picture in my mind, I'll keep our love frozen in time.
I mean, nothing's really wrong, but it's not quite right.
Spent my life playing seeds, but they still haven't turned into trees. So much time chasing dreams, but they still seem so out of reach.
I don't want another day wasted, racing against the sun again. Hate feeling like I'm running in circles.
I don't wanna look back on me thinking that I fucked it up. Am I the only one that's stuck in a circle?
I wonder what they see when they look at me. I bet they see who I really am, but I only see who I couldn't be.
I only see someone who climbs so high and feels so low, got so high then just froze. Tried so hard and got so close, and that's what hurts the most.
I'll never get farther, I'll never get closer by doing the same things over and over.
It's like that feeling when you're just about to kill it. Take your last shot, you know you're going to hit it.
It's like that feeling when you're just about to win the medal and you worked so hard that you knew you wouldn't settle.
When they hear you and you thought they wouldn't listen, it's like an anthem that the whole world's singing.
I'm in-between, I'm all yours or all done with you.
It's funny how we change, but also kinda never do.
I told you I loved you and everything changed and it still breaks me cause when you love someone, the feelings never go away.
I was hoping you would feel the same. Now what? I ruined such a good thing.
I gave you all my heart to break. How come the feelings never go away cause loving you is never gonna change.
Make-believe is better back before I ever knew that you would never really be the one the way I wanted you.
You still have my heartstrings around your finger and I can't escape the thought of you.
Everybody's got something to say, but that's just who we are.
Me and the mirror still continue to fall out. I don't like this stranger staring at me.
All my insecurities, wishing for something different. All the things you do to me.
When they put you down like that, you can reply right back. You are beautiful.
I found myself looking again, wondering why my body doesn't look like them. Know it might sound weird, but I refuse to pretend.
I got more than all these scars, I got flaws and broken hearts.
Tried to find someone new, but they'll never be you.
Another wasted night, can't let you go. Would you please, would you please just leave my heart alone?
Some nights I think that I'm over you.
Bodies and faces, they fill up the room, but I just can't help, but compare them to you.
If I knew that you'd have this hold on me forever, I never would've let you leave.
If you only knew I was hurt this bad. It's crazy, but maybe you'd come running back.
I want you close to me, but when you're here with me, it's hard to tell just what you're after.
You say you want all of me today, but tomorrow's not the same. My feelings never change. What do you want from me?
I need to know if this is mutual before I go and get way too involved. I want you bad, can you reciprocate? No, I don't want to have to leave, but half of you's not enough for me.
This inconsistency, what does it mean? You got me questioning the way you act and take it back, do I mean anything? Just tell me honestly.
Are you playing me? Is this a game? When you show up late, say love at 2am, then tell me you can't stay.
Guess it don't always go like the stories we've been told cause you're gone and you're fine, I'm laying here fucked up.
Oh, I wonder, did emotions fade with the summer? Like an ocean wave, took me under and you left without a sound.
Baby, tell me how, how do you love somebody? How do you love somebody else? Cause when you left, I lost myself.
I just don't get it, how you left so quick. Just 15 minutes, now you're texting him.
You broke my heart and I'm a mess again.
How do you numb the pain so well?
Look how all the tables have turned. Guess you're finally realising how bad you messed it up.
Girl, you're only making it worse when you call like you always do when you want someone.
You took away a year of my fucking life and I can't get it back no more, so when I see those tears coming out your eyes, I hope it's me they're for.
You didn't love when you had me, but now you need me so badly. You can't be serious. That's hilarious.
Thinking I would still want you after the things you put me through. Yea, you're delirious. That's hilarious.
Now you put the blame in reverse, tryna make me feel guilty for everything you've done.
You're just another lesson I learned. Don't give your heart to a girl who's still got a broken one.
I still wonder how you're doing, walk past places we've been in. I hate that you still cross my mind.
Memories that we created, by now I thought would have faded. I hate that you still cross my mind.
I didn't think that this is how it would be and I can't figure it out cause I loved you without a doubt. I really would've thought by now that I would be over you by now.
I guess this is not how it works, when you put somebody first,thought that I would be over you by now.
I hope you figure it out by now, I'm the one who got away.
I hate that I'm wondering why you're still not calling and they say it's for the best. Sure don't feel that way.
Maybe I'm a little too comfortable.
I could love her just a little bit better because if I don't someone's gonna come along and get her.
Oh, nobody can call me a quitter. I should love her just a little bit better.
If I take a seat back and ask myself if I'm doing enough, then I'm probably not.
Eyes are lost in the fog without you here.
Now, I'm standing at your door and I hope that you're not home, so I can get used to being alone on nights like these when my willpower's weak.
I'm gonna call, so just let it ring. I'll drive these streets, don't come looking for me. If you're letting go, then I'm gonna need more nights like these.
I fight the urge to write the words up in my head that I know I shouldn't send.
It's hard to heal when I keep stealing glances at your picture, so I look away again.
You gotta let me drown, you gotta let me fall apart without you here to catch me. If you're not around, I gotta learn to face the dark cause days turn into nights like these.
You're missing a piece of you, it hurts worse than it used to.
I know that you hate it when you have to make brand new friends cause you'll get to wondering if they'll ever let you in.
You don't understand why anyone would love someone who's not enough, but I wish you knew how much I love you. I wish you knew how bad I need you here.
I wish you knew how much I miss you, I wish you knew how bad it hurts to hear that you're not liking it on earth anymore.
When you feel like you're alone in the world, I hope you know how much I love you.
I know you don't like to talk about all of your dark thoughts. You don't like to ask for help, you carry it by yourself.
You think that if you're too seen, the people you love might leave. You feel like you brign them down and you say that it's your fault, how?
We are destined to love and break and to rinse and repeat it all again.
You make me feel like my troubled heart is a million miles away.
You make me feel like I'm drunk on stars and we're dancing out into space.
We were made to be nothing more than this, finding magic in all the smallest things. The way we notice, that's what really matters.
How many lovers have you left for dead? How long will the ghost of you haunt this bed?
All I wanted was you, now I'm ghosted by you.
You left me high and dry. Oh, she's a run away. Ghost in the night, gone without a trace.
Are you with some other guy? Haunting another poor soul. Is he falling like I did, caught up in your spell? Another heart for your collection, do you keep them on a shelf?
Love em and leave em. Babe, you do it so well.
Was it all make believe? Were you ever even there? Your touch was a dream, your absence a nightmare.
You know what you're doing when you're walking in that dress. Baby, I can tell that you ain't easily impressed.
Baby, don't you say that we're just friends when you know we could be lovers instead.
You're out your head, so out your mind to think that I would let you pass me by.
Started kissing like I L, oh I miss you like V E, very much and you know Y, O I need U to read me. Spelling out what I can't say, letters do what I can't, babe.
ILU with a heart, babe.
Whenever you come around, oh, I get nauseous like theb utterflies in my stomach know you're sick. The way that you make me feel is so obnoxious.
Honestly, I would give my head and my heart, oh, for better, for worse. The most I can give you is three little words.
I want to be where you are in the morning. Baby, it just don't stop and the love that you give and the love that I've got is the only one I want.
I still can't do it justice, this feeling you gave me.
I'll be right there with you every step.
When the world don't feel like home, I'm a place to call your own. You can stay forever through.
When you're barely holding on, I'll be anything you want. Open up my heart for you. Baby, I got room for two.
Every day I fall for another part of you and the nights get cold whenever I'm too far from you.
With every breath you take from my chest, try to understand, I'm always right there with you every step.
I can be all you need. Darling, you can take it. All of me.
I think you should know you saved my life.
I don't think you realise what you've done for me.
I don't think you realise what a little love could mean.
Oh, you stayed by my side and you kept on the lights and you knew just what to say when I was fading.
Sometimes all that you need is someone who can believe in you, more than you do.
I was lost until I saw your halo, I was blind until I saw your light. I believe, oh friend, we all have angels and you are mine.
I don't think you realise what your words can do.
The whole world was falling all around me, but I held on to you.
I told myself I'm doing great and I'm not holding on, so don't worry about me, I can keep myself busy. At least it's how I make it seem until the day is done.
Morning turns to evening, haven't even thought about you leaving. Swear to God, I almost got this feeling off my mind.
Every time the lights go out, I see you there when you're not around. Stuck in my head and I know you're gone, but I still hold on to the ghost of you.
Every time I'm in the dark, I feel you there, like a shock to my heart. Back from the dead. I know you're gone, but I still hold on to the ghost of you.
By now, I'd have it together, that I'd left the worst behind, but late at night I start to remember all the times you told me forever, just to leave without a fight.
All of the sleepless nights. Scared that I'll never find someone that loved me and touched me like you. I can't believe that I still want you.
Thought by now that I'd be getting over you.
It's been too long, I don't want this. Feels like everything still leads me back to you.
Drunk nights, you were all that I cared for.
Why did you tell me you'd come back?
You ruined dating and going out, and I can't stay in without spiraling out. Think I'm one drink away from calling you now.
Feels so right and now I'm falling. Stole my heart and changed my point of view cause if I told you that I loved you, you could take it all away from me.
Told you that I trust you, that you could take all of me, everything. If I told you that I loved you, you could be mine. I'd take care of you.
Every little thing that you could ever want, I'm just here to open doors.
Looking fine as hell in my hoodie on the couch, wearing it like it's been yours.
Every day's been great since I met you, wouldn't change a thing since I met you.
We could take a photo, eternalise this moment for the days that I don't believe.
When our love gets stolen cause there's no exception and I know time will take you far from me.
Let this night invade my lungs, you're all I wanna breathe.
Kiss me the way that you would if we die tonight. Hold me the way that you would for the final time.
Whatever may come, somewhere deep inside, there's always this version of you and I.
All our deepest secrets, all the darkest moments. I promise they'll be safe with me.
We've all been broken, there's no exception, but you carry it so gracefully.
Sometimes I hate every single stupid word you say. Sometimes I wanna slap ou in your whole face.
There's no one quite like you, you push all my buttons down. I know life would such without you.
At the same time I wanna hug you, I wanna wrap my hands around your neck.
You're an asshole, but I love you and you make me so mad.
You're the only love I've ever known.
Nothing else can break my heart like true love. It must be true love. No one else can break my heart like you.
Just once, try to wrap your little brain around my feelings.
Sometimes I wonder how we ever came to be, but without you I'm incomplete.
She's got her head in the clouds and she's not backing down.
You can try, but you'll never forget her name.
Nobody knows that she's a lonely girl and it's a lonely world.
Everybody stares as she goes by cause they can see the flame that's in her eyes.
When will you realise. Baby, I'm not like the rest.
Don't wanna break your heart, wanna give your heart a break.
I know you're scared it's wrong, like you might make a mistake. There's just one life to live and there's no time to wait.
The world is ours. If we want it, we can take it.
If you just take my hand, there's no turning back.
I can see it in your eyes. You try to smile away some things you can't disguise.
How did I read the stars so wrong?
It's clear to me that everything you see ain't always what it seems.
I wish I knew then, what I know now. Wouldn't dive in, wouldn't bow down. Gravity hurts, you made it so sweet til I woke up on the concrete.
Falling from cloud nine, crashing from the high. I'm letting go tonight.
Not losing any sleep. I picked up every piece and landed on my feet.
Need nothing to complete myself.
I don't have to pretend.
God knows that I tried seeing the bright side. I'm not blind anymore.
I let it fall, my heart, and as it fell you rose to claim it.
My hands, they were strong, but my knees were far too weak to stand in your arms without falling to your feet.
There's a side to you that I never knew. All the things you'd say, they were never true and the games you'd play, you would always win.
You and me, together, nothing is better.
When we fell, something died cause I knew that that was the last time.
You just couldn't see my dark side with those rose lenses on.
I don't really know what I'm doing and I'm sorry I put you through this, but I never said I'd treat you right.
You call me up and said that we don't talk, but when we do I'm just crossing the line.
It should be me instead, but I guess it's just you were the fool.
Since you've been gone this house is haunted.
Somebody help me, think I lost it.
I gotta calculate my chances of surviving.
When will he learn?
I could love you with my eyes closed, kiss you with a blindfold, figure you out.
I might hold you with my hands tied, show you I'm the right guy to figure you out.
I've been thinking of all the little things that you've been missing.
I could treat you so much better. I've known you forever, figured you out.
















